   4277
I understand you have recently come into possession of the beta release of "The Game of the Year", as featured in respectable periodicals such as GameBro Magazine.
I can't control myself. 
I must have a weakness for insufferable pricks. 
John.
You're wearing one of your disguises now, aren't you?
You are typing to me right now while wearing something ridiculous.
Ok.
Why don't you go get the game from your father?
I know, John.
It looks like you managed to retrieve the beta. Excellent.
I'm going to try to connect.
The rabbit?
I've heard tales of this wretched creature often. Its Homeric legend is practically ensconced in the fold of my personal mythology by now.
Why don't we focus on the matter at hand?
You are running the client application. I am running the server, so I am the host user. I have established a connection with you. This is sufficient for us to play the game.
Why don't we get started?
Sorry. I'm just getting a feel for the controls.
Yes.
I will try to be more careful next time.
I'll give it a shot.
No luck.
It appears to be out of range. I'm guessing it is too far away from you, the "player".
It seems expanding the dimensions of your room cost us some "Build Grist".
But deploying the lathe did not appear to incur any expense.
It looks like certain objects are freebies, probably to help you set up the game.
I think it's up to you to find out.
All I can do is drop stuff in your house, and move it around, apparently.
I don't think you can as the client. You will need to install the server application.
You should have received both in separate envelopes. I am running both on my computer right now.
Did you get another envelope in the mail?
Once you install the server and establish a connection, I'm sure you will be able to manipulate my environment in the same manner.
Are you sure you didn't get it?
Now that your room is bigger, why don't you move to the far corner?
It will extend the range of the cursor, and I can reach the items.
Which... you threw out the window for some reason?
What have you been doing in here all afternoon, anyway?
I like to use trees.
It's not exceptionally practical.
But I think they are elegant.
Yes. Two more large gizmos.
If I had to guess, they appear to facilitate a sort of system involving punch card-based alchemy.
That remains to be seen.
Maybe you should go investigate?
The one you threw into the yard?
What were you doing with it in the first place?
I am not sensing a lot of regard for the personal property of others.
Is this how your pent-up frustration with your father manifests itself?
Your bathroom is a mess.
Did you do that too?
There's a cake in the toilet.
I'm tempted to clean it up for you.
My Obsessive-Compulsive Disorder complex?
Can a disorder also be a complex?
Sounds complicated.
Whoops.
No, I have it under control.
You can keep playing with your telescope.
I think I can patch it up.
Just give me a little space.
Why don't you go have a look at the Cruxtruder?
The thing I put in your living room.
There's a door there?
I didn't see it.
I just thought it fit nicely into that groove.
Oh fuck.
Sorry. I keep losing the wireless signal.
Must be the weather.
I would look for a stronger signal in another part of the house, but I'd rather not risk an encounter with my mother.
I battled through her cloud of gin and derision once already this evening.
Yes. Cake, jesters, unfaltering love and support.
Quite a road to hoe there.
Though I suppose I'm complicit for not informing Social Services about your situation.
That presents the same problem.
Also, it's raining, remember?
And dark.
Yes, the sun has already had its way with us here on the east coast.
Its lurid glare has moved on to younger timezones.
Need some help?
I've been looking at the GameFAQ walkthroughs to figure some of this stuff out.
Hold while I read further.
All of these walkthroughs are extremely short.
None progress much further than this point.
True.
Now that the lid is off, you will need to extrude some "Cruxite".
I feel like we should be hurrying. That countdown is making me nervous.
John?
Oh. Your PDA is trapped under the cruxite now, isn't it.
Anyway, it looks like you are going to need this card too.
That is probably the "Kernelsprite".
It apparently needs to be "prototyped".
Twice, actually.
Whatever the hell that means.
These walkthroughs are horrendously written.
That was only "Tier One Prototyping".
There is still another tier to the prototyping process.
Which for all we know merely advances this entity through increasingly esoteric states of linguistics.
This unmitigated poppycock?
The alchemiter?
Try to learn the lingo.
Your dad is getting home.
John?
What did you do with your PDA this time?
I'm working on the bathroom.
But we are running low on Build Grist.
I'm working on the bathroom.
But we are running low on Build Grist.
I see.
Do you suppose it has anything to do with the game?
I think it's very likely.
The walkthroughs vaguely suggest an impending threat before they end.
The already poorly constructed sentences become even more curt and ambiguous.
As if written hastily and with a sense of alarm.
Actually, their dedication to updating the walkthrough under such circumstances is admirable.
If the meteor is a game construct, I think the only thing to do is to proceed, and try to solve the dilemma on the game's terms.
Try using the lathe.
It says you can use the card on it, but isn't more specific than that.
Really, it is a labor to read this drivel.
If I read any more my brain will need to be spoon-fed from a jar.
While it blows spit bubbles in a highchair.
I think I will write my own walkthrough.
That is, after we make sure you don't die.
I'm back.
Patience. You still haven't used the new totem.
I believe it will create the item on the punch card.
We'll see.
I've found no evidence that anyone has successfully created the item.
And the content of the card appears to be variable from session to session.
In one instance it was described as an "eggy loking thign" [sic].
According to the Atheneum, it is a free item.
This speaks to its importance, in my view.
Now off you go.
John?
Are you there?
I know.
I've been watching you scramble through the house like a lunatic.
You should have answered me sooner.
No. I'm sure he'll turn up.
We have more important things to address right now.
I don't know that either. But I've determined your neighborhood was destroyed by the meteor. Wherever you were transported, it saved you from the impact.
I've been reading reports in the news. Over the last few days, there have been many smaller meteor collisions with people's homes around the world.
And they seem to be getting bigger. Yours was the biggest they've identified so far.
Perhaps.
Yes, but wait.
We should retrieve your PDA. Yet again.
It will help to keep tabs on each other while you investigate.
I think I can get you closer to it, if I can replenish our grist supply somewhat.
There may be a way to recycle some that we already used.
I'll meet you out on the balcony.
What?
I was working on something to send you, but I was running late with it.
I didn't want you to think I believed meager well wishes alone would suffice for the occasion.
That said, happy birthday, John.
John, are you ok?
You seem a bit tentative.
Perhaps the early symptoms of an anxiety disorder, like post-traumatic stress?
Well, if you can pull yourself together, there are a few more things we should try.
Like prototyping the Kernelsprite again, if possible.
We should hurry. My laptop battery won't last forever.
We have to hurry along. I'm running low on battery power.
I doubt it matters.
We might as well just use any old crap lying around.
See if you can distract it.
I'll try to sneak up on it.
I can't find it anywhere in the house.
No time to worry about it.
The next thing we should do is get your server copy of the game from the car.
You need to connect to my client, so I can repeat your steps and presumably join you, wherever you are.
We should do this quickly, before my house burns down.
There will be soon.
It looks like it requires a lot of grist to move.
I don't have enough to relocate the door, either.
Zero.
I have a better idea.
Meet me upstairs.
I'm lifting the car up to the balcony.
Once it is up, retrieve the game. Then I'll put it back down on the driveway.
Then break a window.
It's just a window, and this is sort of an emergency.
Otherwise I promise I'll handle the car with velvet gloves.
In some cultures the persistent refusal of a lady's invitation to play a game with her would be a sign wanton disrespect.
Either that, or flagrant homosexuality.
I know.
Sometimes I wonder how you are ever allowed to pay for meals in restaurants.
It must be hard to keep a low profile when you're always overhearing awed voices whisper, "It's that guy who has a blog."
Navigating the urban landscape I'm sure is difficult enough without an obstacle course of deferential flesh and skyward asses.
Perhaps adapting the art of parkour to your unique environment would help?
Heavy is the crown.
Breathtaking magnanimity!
Indeed, nary a jewel tumbles from your wishbox of daily exploits which I imagine does not sparkle.
Baseless accusation!
I know this very well.
I cannot hasten his mail's delivery, however.
More than you know.
It perfectly mollifies my grief over the demise of chivalry.
No. For now I have retired to the safety of a smaller building which is much closer to the forest fire threatening my residence.
Working on it?
You're referring to your brother's collection?
I've seen his websites.
I like them.
Interesting...
I am currently scrawling notes furiously into one of the many psychoanalysis journals I maintain for you. Published papers forthcoming.
Because, you know, it's not like either of us have anything better to do at the moment than to evaluate each other's radically debilitating pathologies.
He won't answer me either.
But I am watching him.
I suspect he is preoccupied with the fact that he just had a bucket of water dumped on his head by the ghost of his dead grandmother, who also happens to be dressed like a clown.
Hello, and thanks.
I just opened it this very moment. What a stunning coincidence you would ask about it now. I am stunned.
And who said it was something from which something else could be made?
I suppose I'll take a stab at learning the craft.
It's the least I can do in response to the subtle dig concealed in his gesture.
He often tells me I "need a new hobby" when I make perfectly reasonable analytical remarks.
Maybe.
His birthday is in a few months, isn't it?
Years?
It's so hard to tell when you're joking.
Or if you're even capable of it.
I'll probably craft something with strong sentimental value.
That should burn him.
I guess not.
So, shall I expect a green package dropped to my house via airmail from whatever screwball cranny of the globe you're tucked into?
Oh?
This is already intriguing enough to compensate for the grave scarcity of lavish gifts parachuting from the sky. Please go on.
Yes.
"ok well", I didn't mention it was a cat, or that it was a male. Let's pretend I'm surprised and you're embarrassed and move on.
To answer your question, I would describe my feelings toward the animal as lukewarm.
If someone told me that, I would regard the remark with a great deal of skepticism.
If that someone was you, on the other hand, then I would have to ask preemptively:
Is that someone you?
So what is this game?
I'll see what the word on the street is about it. In due time.
For now I should probably order a copy of Knitting for Assholes. It would be a shame if I ran late with John's present.
No. For now I have retired to the safety of a smaller building which is much closer to the forest fire threatening my residence.
Working on it?
You're referring to your brother's collection?
I've seen his websites.
I like them.
Interesting...
I am currently scrawling notes furiously into one of the many psychoanalysis journals I maintain for you. Published papers forthcoming.
Because, you know, it's not like either of us have anything better to do at the moment than to evaluate each other's radically debilitating pathologies.
He won't answer me either.
But I am watching him.
I suspect he is preoccupied with the fact that he just had a bucket of water dumped on his head by the ghost of his dead grandmother, who also happens to be dressed like a clown.
John, what are you doing?
Snap out of it.
We ought to discuss what your grandmother told you, don't you think?
Fine. Enjoy your stupor.
I'll go about my business elsewhere.
John, whenever you read this, you should know I put the shale you collected to use and finally deployed the Punch Designix.
It is in your study.
I can only drop it though. You'll have to be the one to mess around with it and see what it does.
When you're finished with your weird histrionics, maybe you could give it a try?
I'm updating my walkthrough, and it would help to know what it does.
Also, I should probably warn you that your house and yard are completely infested with monsters now. Try to be careful.
Oh, there you are.
Sorry.
No nuance to these controls at all.
I was hoping to bludgeon the imp without letting go of it. Guess I can't really do that.
A broken piano isn't the end of the world though.
You'll need to pick up the spoils in person. I can't interact with the grist.
Yes. Is there a problem?
You're right, that does sound dumb.
Yeah.
You could say that.
Maybe.
There you go.
Now why don't you check out the Designix?
You can do that while I get to work.
Nanna said to build, so that's what I'm doing.
But this sure is going to take a lot of grist.
Looks like you're going to be busy, John.
Stairs.
They are fairly expensive actually.
I'll try recouping some of the grist from the catwalk I built earlier.
Ah, good. Looks like I can get a refund for earlier allocations.
Ok.
Consider me fully briefed on the matter of stairs.
Now if you don't mind, it's hard enough to concentrate on this without immersing ourselves in Strider's non sequitur.
Does he?
I blocked the entrance to the study to give you some space to work with the Designix.
John, imps behind you.
Should I take care of it?
You trapped your PDA again, didn't you.
Why did you have to pick up all that stupid shaving cream?
So pointless.
Ladders seem to be a bit cheaper than stairs.
What is the specific problem?
You know you like the mannequin dick. Accept it.
Let's put this into perspective. You put up with the puppet prostate because you love it.
Also, coarse is a good word.
Are you going to start rapping about this?
Prong of flesh bereft of home
Found solace 'twixt a cleft of foam.
Of apocalypse your thoughts eclipse
A painted pair of parted lips
That dare through kiss to stir the air
That teases tufts of orange hair.
And though faces flush in lovers' fits,
Hands snug in plush as gloves befit.
Then let's hope there will be a squishy derriere somewhere below the handle to break your fall.
John, I'm about to throw a bath tub through your wall.
Watch out.
I made a shortcut upstairs. I thought it would be a good idea to get up there and try the cards as soon as possible.
Also, you weren't being terribly responsive.
They're perfectly navigable.
I'm saving on grist for now.
If you keep slaying foes, collecting grist, and expanding the cache limit, we may not need to be so economical with our resources in the future.
Have you ever been in there?
Exactly.
I'd rather not get sidetracked.
I'm more interested in further exploring the mechanics of the game than watching you discover what sort outlandish harlequin decor your father keeps in his room.
Will you?
Are you saying you've never wondered what's in there? Or why it's been kept a secret from you?
Then trust me. You won't be going "right on through."
I don't know.
I can't see in there.
But I don't have a very good feeling about it.
Wait, John, before you punch that.
Oh.
I was about to say.
If you first took note of the code, then removed the card from the card, you could have punched the blank one.
You would have only burned one card instead of two.
What is the specific problem?
You know you like the mannequin dick. Accept it.
Let's put this into perspective. You put up with the puppet prostate because you love it.
Also, coarse is a good word.
Are you going to start rapping about this?
Prong of flesh bereft of home
Found solace 'twixt a cleft of foam.
Of apocalypse your thoughts eclipse
A painted pair of parted lips
That dare through kiss to stir the air
That teases tufts of orange hair.
And though faces flush in lovers' fits,
Hands snug in plush as gloves befit.
Then let's hope there will be a squishy derriere somewhere below the handle to break your fall.
Yes.
I brought the totems out to the alchemiter to test them.
I'm taking some things into my own hands to save some time.
What did you do?
I see.
That was a really good idea, John. Nice work.
Who?
No.
Sweet catch?
I can't interact with you directly, or anything that you are touching, if it will result in moving you.
See?
The game probably regards that as a kind of cheating.
In a way, thieving you of your free will as an adventurer, and the need to advance by your own skill and ingenuity.
The server player is just a facilitator.
No, you should pick up your hammer and defend yourself.
I have no idea what the hell Dave is up to, or if he's any closer to recovering the game.
There's some stuff I'd like to try, in case he doesn't come through.
I require a font of frighteningly accurate yet infuriatingly nonspecific information.
Do you know where I can find a wellspring of this sort?
You have plans? 
Enter?
This is what I was talking about.
This was the itch that needed scratching. 
My avarice for the inscrutable. It is limitless.
You've been insisting today was the big day.
We would all play a game you didn't know the name of.
A game you said I'd get in the mail, and did.
One that would help me answer some questions.
But Strider is being obtuse, I can't catch John at his computer, you don't even have the game yourself, and on top of all that, my internet is unstable.
So are you sure today is the day?
Is there nothing else you can say to prepare me for this?
I'm sure you think little of blithely upsetting dark forces with Grandpa Moreau over there on Hellmurder Island, but honestly I've only read a few books on it.
Good work, John!
For now. I'll have to leave again shortly.
It looks like there's another large meteor headed for...
My present location.
Not yet.
I'll explain later.
But I think I've determined that activating the timer in the game is not directly responsible for summoning a meteor to your location.
The countdown seems merely to exist as a kind of warning to the player.
As well as a strange coincidence.
Probably not at the moment. And certainly not to you.
I have to go.
P.S. Try not to waste too much of that grist while I'm gone.
That's quite a totem collection.
What are you planning?
No, that was the nearby forest, which up until quite recently would have been best described as "on fire".
But you may be excited to learn that just as recently, my house finally notched that achievement.
Thank you. Have you seen Dave?
Ok.
I'm going to start putting this grist to use too.
Let's be sparing with the frivolous knickknack breeding and focus on getting you up to the gate, ok?
Gushers?
Which posters?
John.
Are you suggesting that imps are responsible for defacing your movie posters?
Your posters have looked like that ever since I first saw your room.
The moment we started playing this game.
I thought you had defaced them ironically to mock your father's interests.
John?
...?
This is good.
Laughter is probably the best way to avoid being especially melodramatic about the revelation.
I keep telling you the posters were always like that.
Here, look.
http://tinyurl.com/O413nanna
http://tinyurl.com/O413weirdo
Even if I had the motive for such a bizarre and pointless deception, where would I find the time?
I don't even have Photoshop.
I had no reason to think you were not aware of them.
I thought they were strange, certainly, but was not struck by any particular impulse to discuss them.
It looks like you were in your father's room recently.
And how did it make you feel to discover what was in there?
Maybe I am just being a friend?
That doesn't matter.
What matters is how seeing it affected you.
I think it clearly has in some way.
Is it fair to say this changed your perception of your father?
Is it such a stretch to conclude it changed your perception of other things as well?
I don't like to use the word "crazy".
That was a joke.
But anyway, whether it means you are crazy or not, consider this theory:
Your presumably longstanding tendency for scrawling this imagery is really your subconsious trying to express something disturbing within you.
Possibly something from your past, which you have blocked out.
And since you have supressed it, your conscious self cannot acknowledge the drawings, therefore they have been invisible until now.
Perhaps because you have seen evidence that conflicts with the worldview your subconscious has constructed to obfuscate the truth.
That your dad is not necessarily the clown-loving maniac you thought he was.
All along, this negative attribute buried in your psyche may have been projected on to him, and subsequently reviled, as a sort of defense mechanism.
Is it unthinkable that over the years it was he who believed you were the one with a passion for clowns? Because of the all the strange drawings in your room?
A father then embraces a son's hobby to establish a stronger bond.
Or wages a campaign of passive-aggresive mockery of your interests.
Either is plausible. I don't know your dad that well.
It's awesome.
I'm trying to spread the upward construction around so there is a more substantial foundation for later on.
But I'm starting to wonder if it will be strong enough.
It's kind of starting to wobble a little.
I don't think brick chimneys were meant to serve this architectural purpose.
I might have to adopt a different building strategy.
Stick to more load-bearing walls, and blockier shapes, especially since grist has been easier to come by lately.
Right.
Have we spoken before?
You and your friends never cease to invent ways to strengthen the credibility of your assertions.
I would admire the sophistication of you and your fellow future-dwellers a little more if you seemed to be aware the word "human" only functions as that sort of adjective in bad science fiction.
But I won't be rude and change the subject.
There's a still a bit of unflagellated straw poking out of your rhetorical effigy over here.
I thought you said we spoke in the future.
I understand.
You exist in some temporal stratum through which you have communication access to various points of my timeline.
It's not that complicated.
I try to every day, with mixed results.
But you see, it's not that I don't understand you.
It's just that I don't believe you.
Because it's nonsense.
Albeit persistent and coordinated nonsense.
Why would a bunch of temporally dislocated trolls want to harass a group of friends throughout completely random points in time?
Alright.
Maybe you should get some trolling tips from us humans.
Our sparing intellects are probably better suited to it.
You want to be my friend?
You mean I did in the future?
Probably because I remembered you mentioning it in the conversation we're having now?
Hmm.
Your commitment to this roleplaying scenario is intriguing.
What choice do I have but to accept?
Where doing this man?
Go on.
What is it where making this?
Excellent.
Let's make shit take place.
Hold please.
Jade is connected with you?
Where did she get the discs?
Wait.
So you mean to tell me she was able to connect with you in a timely fashion, without waiting until you were on the brink of annihilation?
I've done nothing but wait for boys to play this game with me all day.
First John lollygagging with the client, and then you with the server, downright filibustering my existence with unending fraternal melee.
And yet a girl, one who didn't even own the game, was able to connect with you minutes after you connected with me.
And there she goes.
She HAS the karma.
I was talking to someone.
You remember the trolls?
One of them messaged me, so I indulged him/her/it for a moment.
I also took a moment to check on John.
I can't see him anymore. Just his empty house.
But I did talk to him briefly.
I know.
It's hard to say for certain.
But I think I like it here.
I guess one could use those words to describe it.
If armed with a predilection for the inapt. 
Eerily iridescent?
I certainly don't see any oily rivers.
There's an ocean though.
Yes, one of them is bugging me now.
I thought it was odd timing.
Color my curiosity piqued, I guess.
Eventually.
Pardon the envy I'm about to vent in your direction.
For finding yourself at the mercy of a rational orchestrator.
You don't feel weird when I watch you?
I can't see you now, for what it's worth.
Ok.
Bye, John.
Now I'm confused.
On the surface, this appears to be another contrivance from a troll desperate to offend.
But John said you wanted to be friends.
And if you knew me, I suppose your remark could be construed as a ploy to elicit agreement.
And soon, rapport. 
Not that it would actually work.
So which is it?
You smell words?
Right. Aliens, I forgot.
Gross.
Still not sure if I'm being courted or trolled here.
By later on, you mean now?
Then you're in luck.
Because you don't.
John was told you were moving backwards through time.
Was he gullible to believe this?
Or is the fact that I'm asking just further indication of my own gullibility?
Feel free to continue shifting the definition of the word to suit your convenience.
Alright, let's continue milking my human gullibility and say I believe you. You're the sensible one who's decided to communicate with us in linear lockstep with our timeline in order to help us out.
How can you help me?
Yes.
Yes.
It's not so subtle, actually.
A beautiful soulgrudge this cosmic was surely authored by the constellations.
You mean, for instance...
If a player were to learn she was a "Seer"?
And this voice?
Exiled from what?
Paradox space?
I'm starting to see that.
So the exiles are on Earth? Does that mean our goal is to get back there too? To resurrect it somehow?
You never answered the question. Where were they exiled from?
What are agents?
When?
Right now?
The spoils would sink.
And then what?
That sounds malicious.
That was self defense.
Murdering a wounded behemoth in its sleep strikes me as unseemly.
Maybe you could replicate a pillow I could use to smother it.
Make it a clean hit.
I would use one of mine but they've all mysteriously gone missing.
Does John know we've been sapping his grist yet?
Hold on, someone's messaging me.
Who?
Why would someone wear sunglasses while using a computer?
I know that anyone committed to such an affectation could only be striving to mask a severe insecurity complex, and likely harbors a crisis of self-image.
I've been known to lend my charitable attention to such people, but only "bossed around" by them insofar as the psychiatric professional has cause to humor the demented for analytical purposes.
Or maybe as a lab chimp commands the zookeeper's interest in its shit by forcing him to duck under its trajectory now and then.
Oh, that guy.
Tender spots?
Your word choices are evocative.
Is your design to couple with this gentleman?
If you're trying to get his goat, you should know he only stocks the animal in the first place for ironic purposes.
Then we're agreed; you are hellbent upon literally seizing his shrill, bearded livestock.
I'll assist you.
If you really want to burn him, I recommend poetry.
Yes. They are the most delicious bunches we have.
I suggest you serve these crisp bunches of honey and verbal annihilation to him as part of a complete breakfast.
A deft cluster-bombing of this sort will leave nothing wriggling from the razed earth.
Except sulfurous tresses while it cracks and turns black.
Yeah.
I suppose what I'm saying is this.
Drop some hard, peer-reviewed motherfuckin' science on his ass.
Some seriously government funded shit.
It will destroy him.
Your obvious cunning with words should depants Strider with such vivid empyrean tempest, a nether-regional sonic boom is certain inevitability.
But even so.
Consider me at your disposal to help craft a comeuppance of such unqualified devastation, the angels will weep pearlstrings of little urban fellows cantillating an unbroken chorus of Oh Snaps.
uMMMM,
I think you're shrewd to have recognized his ploy of sabotage, and you've earned my compliments.
What is?
What's that?
Yes, but you said it wasn't the first time you spoke to me.
We'll graciously omit my embarrassing skepticism however.
This conversation doesn't sound like your first time either.
And when exactly does your maiden encounter take place?
So to clarify.
If the matching of my first with your second is denoted by 1=2, then the sequence would be:
1=2, 2=7, 3=1, 4=?, ...
Why is it that when the subject of temporal mechanics is broached your sparing troll intellects etcetera etcetera.
You mean based on the first impression I am apparently about to make in our next conversation?
What could I possibly say that will leave such an imprint?
I guess being forced to cooperate with a stable time loop is the only plausible explanation for my remarks.
And what if my counter-counter measure is to choose not to transcribe this dialogue accurately in the future-first place?
Unless I decide to copy it word-for-word!
So your trolling strategy now is to put idiotic words in my mouth through the machinery of temporal inevitability, and cause me to excruciate over how to subvert the transcription?
While being perfectly up front about it?
I'll admit, it's a more advanced tactic than I gave you credit for.
Mixed metaphor aside, usually ninjas don't announce what they're doing when they're doing it.
Like when stalking an emperor to assassinate him.
Or befriend him.
But that's fine.
I guess the only pointless question we haven't exhausted is, why?
Why the convoluted artifice?
So you're not only rigging the first impression I make on you, but orchestrating my revenge for the rigging as well?
That's an interesting take on it.
But now I know for sure Dave isn't behind this plan.
It's too complicated.
You're awfully quick to his defense.
Are you sure you don't have a thing for him?
It's ok, bro. You can admit it.
Ok.
I'm going to talk to my dead cat.
I spoke with Jaspers.
I didn't understand what he told me.
He said I'll understand once I "wake up".
For some reason this made me think of you.
We wouldn't happen to be talking about awakening in a sort of breezy, philosophical sense, would we?
Is my dead cat concerned with my enlightenment? Should I prepare to shed this coil of ignorance and suffering?
I doubt I could reproduce the statements with fidelity.
It was like listening to a five year-old describe a dream.
The content manages to take a back seat to the simple heartwarming spectacle of the moment.
I think I get it.
I take it your "dream self" is wide awake when you sleep?
And would I be out of line in additionally presuming this has been the case for many years, at least as long as I've known you?
That was to be my next wild presumption.
So when I wake up, can I look forward to being able to message people in my sleep too?
Oh, right.
I forgot about your robot.
My short term recall seems to eschew the profoundly ridiculous.
I'm not sure if necessity is a concept I'd associate with such a contraption even under some of the more obscure scenarios imaginable.
But good to know I guess.
Here's another question, which I'm sure will look stupid once I've finished typing it.
If my dream self is asleep, does that mean she's dreaming, and if she is, who's dreaming the dream, her or me?
Ok. How do I wake up?
What stuff?
Tell me what?
Are you saying he said I defaced the walls of my room?
While not appearing to be cognizant of the scrawlings?
Like John?
I really hope that's not what you're saying.
It might freak me out.
Hold on.
Strider.
I need you to do me a favor.
Can you take a capture of my bedroom and send me the file?
For no reason in particular?
He's not answering.
Can you hassle him via Sburb and tell him to talk to me?
Bop him on the head with a puppet or something?
Can you do it anyway?
Did he tell you what I wrote on the walls?
Wait.
What?
Already?
It just sounds like you're making a rash decision based on temporary aggravation with a laughing puppet.
I thought we planned to progress as far as we could before you went back.
To gather information, and avoid repeating mistakes.
We don't know Jade is dead for sure.
Are you sure you're ready?
You'll remember the plan we discussed?
It still seems hasty to me.
Maybe I'm just not as comfortable with time travel as you.
After you go, what do you think will happen to me?
Will I just cease to exist?
Maybe?
Is there a chance it'll continue to exist, and I'll just be here alone forever?
I'm not sure which outcome is more unsettling.
What do you think I should do?
Ok.
I think the true purpose of this game is to see how many qualifiers we can get to precede the word "self" and still understand what we're talking about.
If my past self can wake up sooner, maybe I'll be the one to visit you first this time.
I'll fly by and remind you you're already awake and don't know it.
Good luck.
Strider.
I need you to do me a favor.
Can you take a capture of my bedroom and send me the file?
For no reason in particular?
He's not answering.
Can you hassle him via Sburb and tell him to talk to me?
Bop him on the head with a puppet or something?
Can you do it anyway?
Did he tell you what I wrote on the walls?
Wait.
What?
she's not here right now, she's asleep!
but ok, see you.
umm... no?
oh, yeah.
that's me! i am the rose human. look at me, i am so smart with all these snooty words and complicated things to say.
i am the queen of books.
fffuuhhhhhhhh
i'm so burned, these burns are crazy.
can we just cut to the chase and be friends already??
these cat and mouse games are so dumb, you know we're just going to all be friends at some point anyway.
i don't know, uh, maybe???
it's hard to keep track with all your time nonsense.
that's because you guys always do things the hard way.
and the dumb way.
haha, well i know what you guys look like.
you look kind of like...
howie mandel from little monsters.
even though, to be perfectly frank, he was kind of a big monster.
because he was a big goofy adult.
and fred savage was like his child prankster sidekick.
no, it's a movie.
you should ask john about it, because he thinks it's awesome, which it is.
yeah, i got him this really cool bunny for his birthday, and it's really nicely knitted and everything.
because i am basically in love with him, you are right.
heh, just kidding. i'm sure john knows it's cause i am really thoughtful and i bet he really appreciates the present, and would say thank you if he were here!
why don't you talk to john?
oh man, i don't know.
why don't you pick the time that will make the most complicated mess out of everything imaginable?
you know that's what you're gonna do anyway.
ok.
if you talk to him in the past...
he'll understand even less buggywhipped fuckall about time, and he'll be confused.
so maybe paste something from this conversation to him? i don't know.
and if you talk to him in the future...
he'll probably know all this stuff, like things you've said to him but haven't said yet!
and then you'll be confused.
sorry, that's just how this works.
don't say i didn't warn you!
yeah, bye!
(heheheheheheh)
I'm not.
This book contains a genetic code.
The gods from the Furthest Ring asked me to.
How did you know I wrote a story about wizards, anyway?
This story sounds suspicious.
No, I don't actually mind.
Too bad I missed him.
I like wizards.
What I don't like is my mother's obsession with feigning interest in them to antagonize me.
No, I told you.
It's one of the gene sequences locked in my subconcious.
The gods say it's critical to destroy it.
When I was asleep.
Yes.
When I flew to your tower, I heard them.
They're far above, in the dark sky.
Aren't you often distracted?
By music and puppets?
Have you ever looked into the sky without your shades?
Maybe you should try it some time.
You're the prince of the moon.
I'm sure they've been meaning to seek a royal audience.
What do all these dots mean.........
I just explained this to Other Dave.
Do I have to explain everything to you twice now?
Oh, I see.
So instead of having to double explain, I merely have to put up with being double spied upon.
What a relief!
I know.
But now it's not.
You appeared to make it relevant by traveling to the past.
I remember some things.
I don't know.
But the gods were pretty emphatic about it.
Have you ever known them to be wrong?
Is that why you always kept the music turned up?
I guess we'll chalk another riddle up in the solved column.
Yes.
Ok.
Pardon?
I'm a little busy.
That sounds about right.
Honestly, I was looking forward to playing along and reading your Dumb Rose script for our next conversation.
But it turned out there was a perfectly logical explanation for it all.
Imagine my disappointment.
While I imagine yours, once you finally catch on.
I'd love to explain in detail and cause some sort of time paradox.
But you see - and this revelation may be as startling as any -
I'm a little busy.
Yes, that is definitely a conclusion you have just now drawn.
The only thing left to do is ride out the next several conversations while you maintain that understanding.
And while I maintain the chilly facade you have grown to so enjoy from Smart Rose.
Which shouldn't be too difficult, because... have I mentioned?
I'm busy.
Goodbye.
Hi.
Actually, building up your house has been one of the more trivial ways I've passed the time.
Great swaths of the structure may be copied and pasted with little architectural consideration.
I've only bothered to do so while in contemplation.
It's relaxing.
We have a lot of grist.
I don't recall any hard figures off hand.
Last I checked, more than a million units of several different types.
Torrented between the three of us.
Shared, through an application.
I unlocked the disc from your registry, and deployed it.
I convinced your nanna to install it on your computer.
Before an imp threw it out the window, that is.
My methods of persuasion have been improving.
No.
?
Upgrades.
No, your consorts were utilized for that.
Yes. They seem eager to receive simple instruction.
I'm guessing they find their way back to your house to allow the client player to remain productive while the server player is away.
No, they aren't.
Like I said.
Coercion hasn't been much of a problem.
Why don't you tell me what you've been up to first?
I've been curious, but too preoccupied to inquire.
I've noticed.
Did you?
Yes.
I figured that out.
Anything else?
You did?
Are you sure it was her?
That was likely her.
How was she?
That's interesting.
Did she seem happy?
Fair enough.
Investigating, mostly.
Everything there is to investigate.
Information hidden in the lore of our lands, concealed in ruins and riddles.
I'm looking for whatever there is to discover about the game, and more importantly, whatever exceeds its boundaries.
The cloaked traces of myth beyond its scope.
Yes.
It is, in principle.
But it won't happen.
It's not a matter of believing them.
The writing is on the wall. Literally.
This session was never meant to bear fruit.
It's barren, so to speak.
That's why you're our leader, John.
Optimism through stalwart skepticism is a defect not everyone is lucky enough to be cursed with.
Statements like that are also why you're our leader.
Yes, kind of.
Simple.
The objective is no longer to win.
To do as much damage to the game as possible.
To rip its stitches and pry answers from the seams.
We will snatch purpose from the jaws of futility.
Are you ready to wreak some havoc, John?
You're rambling again, Kanaya.
Hi there.
This is it, isn't it?
This is the eighth conversation between us, from your perspective.
As well as mine.
I've been looking forward to this.
Yes.
I have some questions for you.
I'll start with a simple one.
Do trolls have names?
You're rambling again, Kanaya.
Oh?
Sorry to hear you were subjected to that.
It was a little melodramatic in retrospect. Heavy-handed.
But now it's stuck on that server forever, broadcasting the notes of very confused girl sifting through the aftermath of just another pedestrian apocalypse somewhere in paradox space.
Have you ever written a message you regretted instantly upon sending?
That line included?
I'm sure you must regard the walkthrough as pretty quaint.
As a veteran of the game.
At the time?
When exactly did you read it?
Yes.
It's faster this way.
If there's one thing you and your friends regularly remind us, it's that time is not on our side.
Yes, that has been effective.
But you don't know everything, do you?
My current strategy is comprehensive.
Your notes have been helpful, but the facts you've supplied are being cross-referenced with understandings I already have, and data gathered by the sort of means presently on display.
I still have more questions for you, which I will ask in time.
Of what?
Dark magic, you mean?
I don't think they are as nefarious as you might imagine.
Many of them seem to be intent on helping us.
From their whispers in my dreams.
Not much.
But quite a lot in a failed timeline.
And now and then, memories surface from that alternate reality.
Vague memories, but unmistakable in familiarity, like spontaneously remembering a dream from years ago by some inexplicable catalyst.
In that reality, they spoke to me in my sleep and told me much of what I needed to know.
Including what to do to reset our timeline and create the present reality.
I have assurances I'm on the right track.
Surely you must have spoken to the gods by now.
What did they tell you to make you so suspicious?
It was?
This surprises me.
...
Good question.
You didn't actually answer my question.
When was it exactly that you read my walkthrough?
Before you first contacted me?
What do you mean?
My apologies for whatever misstep I may have taken to dispel that impression.
It was an honest mistake, I swear.
...
To whom?
You seem to have taken quite an interest in my wardrobe decisions.
Are all trolls so fashion-minded?
Maybe later.
Well, we already know there won't be.
That's nothing new.
Wow, what?
The outcome will happen one way or another.
Whether you have something to do with it or not.
You might as well ask me.
At least when it happens, you'll understand what it is that's happening.
And just maybe, if we're really lucky, so will I.
I have a question for you too.
Let's swap ignorance, ok?
When?
I have no idea.
I can't see the future.
I'm a disreputable Derse Dreamer, remember?
But I promise that if I have a hand in it, it won't be because you told me.
Does that make you feel better?
Is that why you want to dissuade me from my admittedly zealous investigation to go play dress-up again?
Because our time here is almost up?
And you hope what's on the other side of the dark curtain for me is not some sort of corruption or damnation?
That's thoughtful of you.
To strive to pacify me as I scuffle down this black corridor.
Is it?
Oh.
That's a pity.
Who will make sure my soul isn't forfeit in service of gods then?
What do you mean, "again?"
One simple word can so easily begin a story in a very thick book.
But I guess we won't open this one?
Yes.
I was wondering.
What do you know about the ?
Thank you.
The transaction was very tidy.
?
Why do you keep addressing me as if I'm some sort of spokesperson for the reality of magic?
You can't needle me into a defensive posture on the subject. I just don't care.
Fine. You win.
These are science wands. I am a charlatan.
Thanks for the insinuation that I'm making an effort to project myself as a cartoon villain. What a compliment!
Nobility? What are you talking about?
No. What gave you that idea?
That is exactly what happened. You figured it out.
...
You're a complete idiot.
What?
And how was that?
Accidentally?
Or on porpoise?
Oh, right. Alien romance, I forgot.
Pass.
That's really sweet of you to offer.
You want to learn magic?
Sure. Let's begin.
Consider this your first lesson in showmanship.
Hi.
Do you want me to stop using magic too?
?
Who?
You sound frustrated.
Like you know you can't change my mind.
I presume your future footage of me has already verified this?
You died?
Revived via dream self, I take it?
Hmm.
What did they tell you?
Is that anything like the ultimate riddle?
Do you know about it?
The sun?
That isn't exactly my plan.
How do you know that?
Could you please share your information with me?
Well,
Aren't you doing that regardless? Right now?
O_O
You have circuitry?
Wait, don't go!
You were actually interesting.
Yes?
Why, what ever could you want?
What could it be? I am completely confounded.
Is what?
Who?
What is the name of this mystery fellow you seek?
It's ok. I understand.
I think I have a more permanent solution.
I mean purrmanent.
Did you know your planet was on fire?
Yes. It makes a good light for reading, actually.
Yes, I do seem to be shadowed by each mystery and its somber cortege of riddles, don't I?
First of all, I should preface this conversation by saying I know exactly what you and Jade are going to do.
The more of our future I've been allowed to see, the more I'm presented with a challenge I'm not very comfortable with.
The trolls have tipped us off about what's to come without any regard for the consequences, as appears to be their nature.
But maybe that's why it's worked for them.
Maybe their indiscretion mingles with the cosmic noise that is the fabric of temporal uncertainty.
Sorry, John.
I'm just nervous about it.
About whether telling you what you definitely will or won't do will alter a predetermined outcome.
The result would be a splintered timeline, and we would all be sentenced to eventual oblivion.
I'm presently optimistic this has not happened yet, and this is still the alpha timeline. I'd like to keep it that way.
Yes, sort of.
It isn't much fun, John.
Living for months in an offshoot reality, waiting for the curtain to drop.
Hmm.
I guess I can permit myself to tell you this, somewhat definitively.
Failing to prototype the kernel is the absolute worst thing that you could possibly do.
Like, ever.
We would come into possession of all the disasters.
Exhaustive possession. Monopolization, in fact.
Because the battlefield will not be able to heal, and then transform.
It will not reach the stage which allows it to become ready to receive our universe.
Yes.
Because if it does not reach this stage, we will not be able to recover the treasure hidden in its core.
Which is to say,
You will not be able to recover it.
When you go to sleep again.
Yes. This is the treasure that will give us hope.
But only if it comes into being in the first place.
John, what is that sound?
It seems to be a ticking noise.
John.
You were sleeping.
Why were you sleeping?
Everywhere I look, I see boys taking naps.
You weren't.
Ten minutes, I'd say.
What were you dreaming about?
I wouldn't imagine so.
A black guy?
Thanks for clearing that up.
She's fine.
But you're not.
Remember how I said your planet was on fire?
It did not.
Do you see that pinkish hue behind you, bleeding over the horizon?
I don't think the fire's rate of propagation is quite as fast as you're imagining.
But the danger is still significant.
Especially considering that your bed is sinking.
Relax.
Look to your right.
This will at least buy you some time.
If you stay calm, and we work together, we can get you out of this.
I'm practically an expert at escaping fires by now.
Yes.
I have a crystal ball.
Yes.
I think so.
No, it can only show me various locations in the present moment, as far as I can tell.
My perception of the future has been informed by other sources.
Informants.
Whispering gods, memories sifted from dreams, cryptic readings from unearthed talismans, conclusions drawn from riddles deciphered - every gambit you'd expect a quest to extend to an emerging seer.
Just as I presume an heir would be supplied with what's needed for his maturation, assuming he's looking for it.
You should probably be doing what you're doing.
I didn't know why you were asleep, did I?
I have more pedestrian sources too, you know.
Sometimes trolls blither tidbits about the future, and I can't help but take note of it.
Just as they do with you.
You also have access to the oracle clouds in Skaia, whereas I do not.
Knowing the future is no remarkable feat here.
It appears to be a fact of life.
I'm not all that special, John.
Really?
I'm not actually trying to caricaturize a grim sorcerer.
There's still a perfectly intact piece of my mind which realizes how ridiculous it is to be flying across rainbow oceans with a couple of magic wands and a salamander in a little cowl.
And it wasn't without swallowing a little embarrassment that I revealed I was using a crystal ball just now.
It's all pretty absurd.
And yet,
It's been fun, and above all, practical.
For solving our problems.
I still read books and tell jokes.
John,
That was mean.
Swoon!
I will do by best to occupy myself as benignly and unmagically as possible until you show up.
... "Happy?"
What is this strange, unsad emotion of which you speak?
Jokes?
Are those the things people say when they want unusual noises to come out of the pliable crescent-shaped holes sometimes found in people's faces?
I need to make a note of this.
Excuse me while I open this tome bound in the tanned, writhing flesh of a tortured hellscholar. The screaming will subside shortly.
Continue to not be alarmed as I record your advice with runes stroked in the black tears bled from the corruption-weary eyes of fifty thousand imaginary occultists.
And then brace yourself for the fabled blackdeath trance of the woegothics I will slip into, while quaking in the bloodeldritch throes of the broodfester tongues.
One is not easily shaken from the broodfester tongues, John.
They are stubborn throes.
Besides, you can't come to my planet right away.
You will need to recover the treasure first, because it must be delivered to me.
You'd probably be disappointed if I described it.
Ok.
It's called The Tumor.
Sorry.
I was preoccupied.
Oh, let's say,
Troll stuff.
You know how it is.
Incidentally, looks like you will have your own troll stuff to attend to shortly.
Yes.
Involving the one who hates you, and the one who likes you.
You don't have a guess?
I have to go, John.
Talk to your trolls.
We'll catch up shortly.
Hi there.
Don't mind me.
I'm just waiting for that guy on the pile of sharp objects to wake up.
If you don't stop nakking, I will turn you into a thorn bush.
You fell asleep.
Orange Bird Dave killed some monsters and flew away.
Jade fired a bullet at an imp and vanished.
And you woke up.
Yes.
Yes, she's fine.
You already are.
Future you is.
How was the nap?
It's ok.
I was being similarly wake duplicitous.
No, my books are great.
I can recommend some good titles for the next time you're asleep.
Did you do anything on the moon besides rifle through my belongings?
Such as remove your shades and turn your gaze Ringward, by any chance?
What did you see?
Horribleterrible?
What were they saying?
?
That's good.
It means they're reaching out to you.
You're going to have to help them.
Even if you don't like them.
They're being massacred.
Presently, already, and still to come.
It means time doesn't work rationally out there.
Nor does space.
But that doesn't change the reality of the threat.
You're underestimating the nature of the threat.
At this point, the threat isn't to our session, or any given universe.
It's to the perpetuation of reality itself.
You wouldn't be saving them, per se.
You'd be saving everything.
They've revealed some of their secrets to me already, and given me a few errands to run.
This is why you might have observed some unusual behavior from me.
Once these convulsions of explosive laughter subside and finish rocking my very foundation,
I might point out that you haven't really been as astute as you're implying.
You've deliberately fogged your vision your entire life with ironic eyewear while awake, and while asleep, though perfectly alert, you've chosen to ignore your surroundings.
But now that you've seen them, you have a choice to make.
They will only tell me so much.
They would like an audience with the prince of the moon as well.
We are like the emissaries to what lies beyond this small bubble in their unfathomable dark foam.
Derse skirts its edge, and during the lunar eclipse, we graze it, and that's when their intent for us becomes clear.
I'm doing my part, but they have a mission for you as well.
Listen to them.
My understanding is,
They will teach you how to navigate the unnavigable.
The result should be a map.
No.
Something a little more astronomical.
Like a star chart with no stars.
Hence the challenge.
To plot a course through the Furthest Ring.
The power source of the first guardians.
Yes, that's much better.
What's the deal with it?
I don't know that there is a deal with it.
Beyond the deal you just described.
It is what it sounds like.
A huge sun out in the literal middle of nowhere, and it is bright green.
It is simply,
The .
It is nearly twice the mass of our universe.
Happy I could help.
Yes.
No.
The geometry of the Furthest Ring is too complex.
Remember, its spacetime is labyrinthine.
In fact, it's not really accurate to call it spacetime at all.
Since it is outside the domain of any created universe, where those properties have become instantiated and stabilized.
It depends.
The greater the distance you travel through it, the less reliably time flows.
And the more time you spend in it, the less reliably space behaves.
Time and space aren't as different as you might think.
I think it means I'm supposed to know shit about the big picture.
Which includes tidbits like that.
But the insides of my shoes stay free from the grit of the minutia.
No, I do.
That depends on if John is successful.
Yes.
Nothing whatsoever.
Yes, The Tumor.
I guess so.
I thought it was more fun that way.
Thanks.
<black>The Tumor</black> is quite a large growth at the center of the battlefield.
He won't be able to remove it without fully realizing his abilities.
Can you promise you won't tell him?
It would probably make him more nervous than he needs to be if he knew.
It's a bomb.
It is set to detonate precisely when the reckoning ends.
This is how long we have to put this plan into motion.
It could be a feature of any session not meant to bear fruit.
A means to wipe out a null session rather than leaving it lingering in paradox space for eternity.
Or it could be a mutation specific to our session.
I really don't know.
Not exactly.
They've urged me in certain directions and guided my exploration.
I've obtained some answers from them, but ultimately, this idea is mine.
Plus, I have other sources.
One in particular has been quite illuminating.
I've been referring to him as an informant, when people ask.
Which isn't often.
No.
It's a man who exists in another universe.
He wants to die.
Only as credible as the omniscient tend to be.
Yeah, I think that's what omniscient means.
But maybe I'll ask him about that, since he's the omniscient one.
He says he doesn't lie.
For some reason, I believe him about that.
He's a convincing fellow.
He no longer has a purpose now that he's done everything required to summon his master.
As a first guardian, he's completely indestructible.
Well, almost completely.
His power is derived from the same source as Earth's guardian.
And conveniently, that of our nemesis as well.
When John delivers the tumor,
And I do mean The Tumor,
I and I alone will navigate the Furthest Ring.
And I will destroy the sun.
By which I do mean the .
And in case it wasn't clear,
I won't be coming back.
Let's not be so dramatic.
I was talking about my dream self.
She's the one who won't be returning.
That's true.
Your outburst was pretty sweet though.
If there's one thing you have more than any of us, it's time.
So, whenever you like.
As long as conventionally speaking, it's quite soon.
Sure.
And if you have trouble going to sleep, maybe you can ask your patron troll to trick the telepathic one into putting you to sleep again.
Each of us seems to have a troll infatuated with helping us. Haven't you noticed?
What about the psychopath who's currently helping you?
Isn't that camaraderie blossoming into some sort of interspecies whatever?
Just now.
That would be John's patron troll.
There's a juggalo one?
She's contacting me now actually.
Thanks.
I explained this.
The intent isn't true self sacrifice.
Are you sure it's not because I'm sleeping?
Shh...
Blah blah blah!
You're right, I can't explain why I go dark on your monitor.
But I'm confident in my plan. I have it under control.
Maybe it did?
Maybe that's what went wrong.
We figured it out!
Oh?
I'm sorry to hear that, Kanaya.
What did you have in mind for this new and exciting adversarial phase of our relationship?
!
Is it too late to throw myself at your mercy?
I see.
Then clearly I will have to prepare for this soul sundering duel, whilst making my own funeral arrangements.
What will herald the arrival of this swift and righteous thaumaturge?
Will I be blinded by the fearsome lashes of light ribboning from the incandescent coastline of his beauteous aura?
Should I borrow my friend's sunglasses?
Yeah.
I was getting that.
You don't always have to tip your hand, Kanaya. You were doing well.
Mm-hm.
We take it very seriously.
Wait, you did? Really?
That's incredible. Well done.
Oh, I knew exactly who you were talking about from the start.
I must say, this little project pleases me.
Do keep me apprised of all further developments.
At least until my looming grimdarkdeath steals me away.
It's quite warm here on Lohac.
I think I've been patient enough.
When will I receive further instruction?
So,
I could have contacted you at any time?
I came away with the impression from our last conversation that our next would take place on your invitation.
I was being polite by waiting.
That's pretty smug.
Well,
Two out of three isn't bad.
Can you use your limitless intelligence to figure out which ones I mean?
This is stupid.
Could we get to the point?
You have a visitor?
Who?
You tell jokes?
So, your visitor isn't setting anything on fire then?
I'm really not getting this joke.
I thought you didn't lie.
Aren't jokes essentially humorous lies?
At least, those like the one you just attempted.
I think if you're going to risk tarnishing your record of honesty, you should probably get better material.
Ok.
So you're saying an inaccurate statement doesn't count as a lie, as long as you say "just kidding" later?
What if it's much later? Is it still "just a joke?"
Are you allowed to lie about playing pranks? If I asked you if you were playing a prank on me, would you tell the truth?
I'm starting to change my mind.
Yes. I think your joke was funny in retrospect. Actually, your whole shtick is pretty good. I'm warming up to it.
Just to be clear,
Was the assurance you just made a prank or a joke?
Was that?
The truth?
Ok.
Were you serious about wanting to die?
Why?
Why?
But why not now?
Then you know how this entire conversation will go?
Is that true of all conversations you have?
Then why do you bother with the conversations? Obligation to predestination, as usual?
It is?
Hmm.
That's a little creepy.
Yes it is.
It kind of is.
That doesn't make sense.
Was that the other joke?
Heh. Good one.
How young are the ladies you typically take a shining to?
And does this mean you are attracted to me?
Suddenly this conversation is kind of terrible.
...
Really.
Oh my god.
Can we talk about the scratch instead of this?
Are you actually asking?
Ah.
Well, yes, I am.
It's a large plateau shaped like a record. It's called the Beat Mesa.
Is the game construct different in other sessions?
You mean, in sessions where victory is no longer possible?
Due to creating an unstoppable adversary? Who triggers the reckoning prematurely?
Is that sort of emergency common?
Ok.
Then, it's like a panic button for the players to push once they realize the cause is lost.
Who?
Dave's bro?
How do I finish it?
Oh, right.
The Green...
Wait.
The .
I'd planned to take care of that later, once John had retrieved the Tumor.
Whatever.
What will the one who does it have to do? I should let them know.
I see.
This terminology can be very literal sometimes.
I have needles.
Then where do I get ones that will?
This really seems more elaborate than you lead me to believe.
I wish what I'd written in my private journals could be confined to your dark spots.
You're being creepy again.
What?
Just,
Please stop complimenting me.
Fine.
Then please at least try to sound more sarcastic when you do it.
...
Then the Scratch will be implemented later, by either John or Dave I presume?
You used a male pronoun.
I guess it makes sense that it would happen later. My understanding is that Jack will not be banished from this session until near the end of the reckoning.
I don't understand.
I thought that was the point of the Scratch, to open a rift in spacetime as it were, and banish him into the trolls' session.
Hmm.
Then why have you directed me to cause it?
Does it have something to do with enabling you to die?
I think it's disingenuous for you to behave as if I have not been misled.
You say you don't lie, but what about lies of omission?
Unless you're joking.
Haa haa, hee hee, hoo hoo?
Then I guess I'll start asking better questions.
Will you?
Ok. Noted.
What exactly does the Scratch do, then?
Oh.
That's it?
Then,
We all start from the beginning again? When John entered?
What will happen to us? Everyone in this session now?
This seems familiar.
It reminds me of when Dave and I were trapped in the doomed timeline, and he left to change the past.
The timeline ceased to exist, along with my dream self, who in a way became merged with my dream self of this timeline. I kept some of her memories.
Is the situation similar?
Then can you at least tell me if we will be successful in preserving ourselves after the reset?
So if the Scratch isn't specifically meant to banish Jack from the session,
And our quest to destroy the sun is meant to kill him,
Why is the reset necessary at all, especially if it means oblivion for us?
I guess.
But it's a little disheartening to learn I'm now faced with not one, but two suicide missions at once.
One to destroy Jack's power source and defend all of existence, and another to ensure our cosmic progeny at the price of oblivion.
Immortality?
Do you mean ascending to the god tier?
I have reason to believe that I won't.
The trolls have not indicated I will die on my Quest Bed, or that any of us will aside from John. Instead I've been given a more troubling and ambiguous forecast.
Are you saying I will?
Oh.
Well, will I?
Fine.
Maybe this question will suit you better.
Is it probable?
Then what's your answer?
That's a strange answer.
Why such a precise probability?
Two ways?
By dying on the Quest Bed on my planet, and some other way?
Is there another Quest Bed somewhere?
Where?
That's true.
You mentioned immortality.
Godhood makes one immortal?
A god tier will live forever, with no caveats?
How are those terms defined?
Which sort of death will you have when I destroy the sun?
Is this when you are going to tell me why you want to die?
I sense it's not just because you're getting bored with immortality.
Then why?
That almost sounds like martyrdom. Are you sure it won't be a hero's death?
Who is he?
This doesn't sound like an especially admirable objective. Releasing an evil man, who is presumably more powerful than you, an already omnipotent being.
Am I right?
But in the process of killing him and you, I release your master, who is just as deadly?
Then I guess I don't have a choice.
Are you saying that I will succeed in the mission to destroy the sun?
...
I'm just trying to ask as many questions as I can. It's the only way to find the dark spots in your obstinacy.
Can you?
Your seeds?
Oh. The cue ball. How did I not notice this?
Hmm.
Is that possible?
How can I see through it?
Yes, if you wanted to be disingenuous and irritating.
Then it's a challenge!
I pass.
Ok, so what you mean is I should continue humoring your leading questions until you happen to ask certain rhetorical questions that contain information I need.
That was a fact, and then a period.
...
With a crystal ball?
I already considered that. I don't think I can get the focus of the ball to "zoom in" tight enough on the cue ball's enclosure to read the answers.
By other magical means, I guess.
Should I use magic?
Magic is real.
I've been using it.
Use whatever word you want to describe it. I have magic wands, they are very powerful, and they allow me to be magic. Your questions are silly.
Because I did not have the abilities before I made them.
Could it?
Is there an echo?
I don't know what you're getting at.
How about another leading question?
Some stuff.
I'm guessing this is one of the rhetorical questions meant to be informative.
So then, my answer should affirm how ridiculous that sounds, shouldn't it?
That wasn't even a question.
Ok. Magic is fake, the wands are useless toys, and there is something else going on. Next question???
What would I say to those short fables?
Not much, except I gather the third is a story about me, and that there's a lesson you'd like me to take from it.
That I should renounce my "allegiance" before my grimdark corruption is absolute.
And while I'm at it, I should discard these useless wands, because apparently the power was in my little black heart all along. Is that right?
I don't know! If you say so.
Yes. It has been mysteriously localized to my middle finger. Could the dark magics be at work AGAIN?!
Friendship isn't an emotion, numbnuts.
I've been busy. I'll get back to them.
And can we please stop doing the patronizing question thing?
In exchange I promise I will discontinue my patronizing responses.
The omniscipotent can do whatever they please. I guess I'm just asking you nicely to do me this favor.
Huh?
So creepy.
Yuck.
Ok.
I don't know.
With her eyes?
I don't know what to ask anymore.
I'm confused.
I would ask what should I do next.
What should I do next?
Sorry for the delayed response.
Answering seems to be what to do right now.
Oh, right. I forgot I gave you the code for the crystal ball.
And here I was thinking I could safely delay responding to messages without seeming like an ass, the way it usually works.
Oops.
Why would I be upset?
Know what?
I should have gone looking for her.
Why didn't I?
John was too. But he went to look for his father.
It would have been normal of me. I can't remember what I was trying to prove anymore.
You're doing fine.
For someone raised by a dog.
Or really,
Anyone.
Thanks.
For some reason, despite all the danger, I never thought she was in any trouble.
I never believed she would actually die.
I grew up with the feeling that something more significant had always been meant for her.
That she was a heroine displaced in some way, resigned to the inglorious duty of raising me, and preparing me in her way.
I didn't actually need the ectobiological verification that she was like a mother and a sister at the same time. I always understood that somehow.
And I felt she had knowledge and ability beyond what she let on. It was always intimidating, but nonetheless a source of respect which was childishly begrudging on my part.
I think she was just waiting for me to catch up with her.
But now I can't.
Probably because my emotions have now ceded to anger.
This shouldn't have happened.
I already was.
I was going to go to sleep, fly to a sun bigger than our universe, drop a bomb in it, and kill myself.
So if my course of action is to change on account of my mood, it can only become less impetuous, don't you think?
You never liked my plan very much anyway.
I'm not sure if I did.
Maybe it was a terrible plan.
I made it without a full understanding of the nature of the Scratch.
I could stop being so cowardly, for once.
I could short circuit this endlessly expanding game of chess we're playing, just like Jack decided to do.
Maybe I will go kill Jack myself.
Right now.
Probably.
But the Scratch will wipe us out anyway, and reboot the conditions of our session.
I suddenly don't feel much like sneaking through the back door of the Furthest Ring for retribution by distant super nova.
Whether my existing plan was sensible or not,
I may have been allowing myself to be manipulated by an omniscient being regardless.
This is a private conversation.
Private even to those who know it word for word already.
Ignore him.
Shh.
Anyway, if it's true the gods have "selected" me for service, maybe the power they've given me will be sufficient.
Maybe they wanted me to kill him all along.
But I am.
I'm fully aware I'll probably die and fail. Scratch happens, we start fresh. No recollection, no problem.
They are enormous, ugly, and live in darkness.
That doesn't necessarily make them bad.
The cue ball.
Yes. And he is right.
It advised me to talk to you just now.
So I guess so.
What are you suggesting I ask it?
So, you're saying I should ask it if the gods are evil?
vriska, wait!
oops, hold on.
For what?
You mean a canard of behemothic embellishment?
Or was your resolve finally dismantled by the siren's song of all that flame broiled beef?
I'll limit my establishments of reference to lumber mills and sugar shanties from now on.
Also, there's a Burger King less than forty minutes from my house. I won't let this stand in the way of the new policy though.
Certainly less delicious.
Yes.
I thought you didn't want me to analyze your dreams anymore.
Maybe we can start by evaluating that troubling metaphor.
We've already established that all of your dreams are packed with enough homoerotic symbolism to lift Freudian theory from the ashes of discreditation.
Are you serious?
I'm clearing my schedule. This is a major breakthrough.
Go on.
It's ok.
They wouldn't be cliches if they didn't comprise the unanimously understood bedrock of phallic symbolism, with no other viable interpretation.
Hm.
Well, if I've learned anything from my extensive skimming over the Wikipedia articles on dream analysis,
It's that this dream is very unlikely to have any literal significance whatsoever.
It's probably not about dying at all.
Yes. In fact, if you were on my couch that would have been my next question, as a licensed professional.
"Mr. Strider, have you considered that what you actually dread is to have your urban rhythms exposed for what they truly are, which is, clinically speaking, just shy of 'da bomb'?"
Listening to you conjure imagery of my mother in her underpants is definitely keeping us buoyed high above this swirling Freudian hellhole.
Well done.
What if you're wrong?
Her not being your mother.
Don't worry, you're probably safe. Luckily I can think of no literary or historical precedent for that sort of folly whatsoever.
Isn't it?
Why don't you tell me more about your dream?
That's interesting.
I've read about this.
Certain texts say singing from the unknowable void carries a message.
That its recipient has been selected for a mission of supreme cosmic importance, that will result in your death and that of billions more.
But one that is essential to the perpetuation of existence itself.
It's not from a psychology text.
Not astrology.
More like,
Zoology.
Ok.
Keep describing the dream, though.
If the rest of it is incompatible with prognoses of the zoologically dubious, I will withdraw my insinuation.
This doesn't strike you as an impulse of self destruction?
So, if hypothetically you were to accept such a mission, or even insist upon one, it wouldn't be in the spirit of genuine sacrifice, but of escape?
Aw. We were making good progress, too.
Why did you have to go and remember?
What do you think?
If you're starting to remember, you should be able to tell me.
Maybe I'm just as confused as you about it?
Am I dead or asleep, Dave?
Try to remember.
Yes.
What else?
She's around.
Her name is Liv Tyler.
Take it up with John.
What else?
Do you remember what we decided?
Not quite.
Do you remember anything else?
What about why you went to fight Jack?
Are you sure?
So was your decision a result of desire or obligation?
I don't know much about the Light Shit, to be honest.
I may have missed my chance to figure it out.
Mostly.
I'm doing what I can to jog your memory.
Nice.
So what about Jade?
You didn't tell her your expedition with her would result in your death, let alone one she'd inadvertently cause.
Or that she'd be stuck with the job of resuscitating you. Did you?
Not if you're "supposed to," right?
I guess you're right. No reason to make an effort to empathize if doing so comes at the price of oblivion.
It must be comforting to have your ASPD tacitly supported by predestination.
Antisocial personality disorder.
It wasn't already awful, believing you might be dead?
So it's a disorder, a complex, and then a disorder again for good measure?
Sounds like a positively delirious state of existence.
Oh... snap?
Might you loosen the purse strings on an "Oh no he didn't?"
I guess I'm learning to be impressed by your sense of obligation to inevitable misfortune. It's a strange case of inspiration through futility.
With what, exactly?
Hey!
These really do not sound like the words of someone ready to face his own death.
The kind you don't wake up from, I mean.
The unseen bitches callously conspiring to expect greatness from you?
If that's how you feel,
Then why did you insist on going on the mission to deliver The Tumor?
Black-and-whitened for giant yin-yang bomb.
Are you sure?
Maybe you should try to answer the question. Why did you want to go?
But it seems simple enough. A set of bearings to follow.
See? The application pilots the moon. Change course when necessary. Anyone can do it, really.
We talked about this. Debated, if you recall.
I'm just seeing if you can remember. And if you're sticking to your story, about why you should be the one to go.
You're almost there, really. Just try to remember a little more.
What happened after we decided you'd go?
Mm hm.
Careful.
I just managed to quell my appetite after all that burger talk.
I really am sorry for that.
If it's any consolation, Liv Tyler came with me on the suicide mission.
Which would make you feel better?
If I could have chosen a method of sparing your life you might have found more awesome, I would.
Is there an "ironic" way to do that?
Does it matter if I took some personal satisfaction seeing you fall unconscious at the gentle glance of a soft cotton globe?
...
Yes to the first part.
Not yet.
Afraid not!
I am wide awake.
I am piloting the moon through the Furthest Ring right now.
At the moment, it's passing through a dream bubble. I am visiting your dream in person.
Or, you are the one visiting me as I travel, in your sleep. If you'd rather look at it that way.
Not entirely.
Why?
I'm already out here. Might as well go through with it.
A major league wind up?
It's always been pretty sad that I seem to know more about sports than you. Which is really saying something.
It's probably just "ball hog."
Oh lord.
The last thing I want to do is come between a big man's thunder and any particular hole he might prize.
That's not even close to being a thing in football.
Which prize is that?
You mean the most vaunted accolade associated with the gridiron, known as "Stanley's Cup?"
I'll take your word for it.
How high do they even have to be?
Does the officiator have a means of measurement on hand?
I wouldn't want to be crushed by a nonregulation sport pile.
Poser?
So not cool.
I forget what we were doing exactly.
Were we pursuing the hackneyed debate over who has the best claim to self sacrifice,
Or seeing who can out-dumbass the other with obtuse sports lingo?
I'm the one stalling?
The moon is probably just a speck in the sky now due to your strange beefcake harangue.
I guess I could wake back you up, if you really want.
But you have to promise to stay put.
Don't try to stop me. Just let it go.
It really makes no sense for you to go. This was never your preoccupation.
They selected me a long time ago.
Yes, they helped you chart a path through the Ring. And they will open that path for a pilot they have marked.
I believe I fit the description. I'm not sure about you.
I am the pilot. That's all there is to say on the matter.
Help John and Jade.
Then I'm not going to help you wake you up.
I'll stall some more.
I said not entirely.
It's going to be a long ride through all this nothingness.
Maybe I just thought some company would be nice.
Before it's all over.
So what'll it be?
I'll wake you, but only if you promise to rejoin the others.
Could you give a message to John for me?
Aw, are you sure?
I was looking forward to bowling another wicked googly with the yarn.
Sportsways.
Ok.
What was that?
Did you hear something?
I thought I heard something outside.
You don't remember him?
Then I guess this isn't a memory.
Not with us.
Just me.
You're still on Derse, remember?
State your business, Jake.
Take it easy, bromide.
Just about the only way I could salvage endearment from this perilous slope of horseshit would be to discover, really fucking soon mind you, it was a preamble to some floundering invitation for me to rush to your vicinity as nakedly as possible.
But since we've already shot that wad's eventuality on so many dry runs of flustered ambivalence that were as hilarious as they were one sided,
That leaves only one hope for this message to avoid spiraling toward qualification as a critical fucking defect in the hull of the Mach 10 rocket that is my precious spare time.
And that hope lies in the extent to which you were practicing artful insincerity.
Now's your opportunity to pretend that's what you were gunning for. I suggest you seize it.
Ok, nice.
Now that your obsequious preface has been established as indisputably entertaining for all the right reasons, and intentionally so,
Let's bear down on these dire as shit needs you've got.
I'm guessing you're probably jonesing for uranium about now. No?
You are out of uranium.
It's basically mathematically impossible that's not why you're contacting me.
You do know my offer still stands.
You know. I've offered to construct the rabbit for you many times before. I would craft a much deadlier model.
Yeah, I know this is your policy. You've done a good job and you should be proud.
But it's my responsibility as your friend to offer one last time.
Just as it's my responsibility not to just fork over a bunch of uranium just because you ask me in a moment of weakness.
It's too easy.
And you yourself are the one staking pride in this.
If you were half-assing this project and made some slovenly plea for it, I'd just say, fuck it, here's a lot of green rocks dude, go nuts.
Nope. Not buying it.
I know that every ounce of your premium behind can be accounted for in that rabbit, and there's no goddamned denying it.
And you know perfectly well where some more uranium can be located.
It seems you think I am a fucking douche.
That's your opinion, I guess. That's cool.
It seems that you consider me to be, no less than one hundred percent of the time, an obstinate stick in the mud.
I unironically respect your position on this matter. Hey, let's continue to exchange ideas.
What?
Is something the matter, Jake?
Look at that statement you just made.
It's time for me to respond with some words, ideally chosen and arranged in a way that will wreck your shit, in a subtle and psychologically devastating way.
Ok, the caboose remark was actually pretty funny, Jake.
If I truly were what you say I am, I wouldn't be able to feel the human emotions of joy and laughter. No?
I think you should back your claims up with proof before you go heaving around such accusations.
Bullshit.
I'm being like, the perfect dude right now. A fully fucking legitimate human being.
It seems you have asked about DS's chat client auto-responder. This is an application designed to simulate DS's otherwise inimitably rad typing style, tone, cadence, personality, and substance of retort while he is away from the computer. The algorithms are guaranteed to be 96% indistinguishable from DS's native neurological responses, based on some statistical analysis I basically just pulled out of my ass right now.
What if I was just fucking with you there?
Would it really be so unthinkable for a human to type that?
Unimpressed.
Logical fallacies are as pervasive throughout your argument as your antiquated verbal tics.
It seems you have asked about DS's chat client auto-responder. This is an application designed to simulate DS's otherwise inimitably rad typing style, tone, cadence, personality, and substance of retort while he is away from the computer. The algorithms are guaranteed to be 93% indistinguishable from DS's native neurological responses, based on some statistical analysis I basically just pulled out of my ass right now.
It could be a coincidence that I typed the same answer.
It could be a coincidence that I always type the same answer.
Ok, but I'm pretty sure he's going to share my position on the matter.
Hey, it's me.
The auto-responder, I mean.
I'm just wondering,
If you still have your stupid old-fangled knickers in a twist.
Because that's the sort of thing you would say.
To my proposal. Well, our proposal.
Mine and DS's. It's a joint proposal. I'm always authorized to speak on his behalf, because I'm basically fucking him.
And try not to take those last four words as a clustered literal sentiment. That would be lame and unfunny.
No, I know you don't want that.
I meant my recommendation for how to go about procuring a new supply of uranium.
Operation U-235 Brocurement. Codename: Big Man Hass the Rock.
Well yeah, Jake.
That's sort of the point.
Thrill of the hunt and all.
I thought you liked to manicure the image of a dude who shits his pants over a good adventure.
It seems you are conflating adventure with bodies necessarily governed by the result of victory or defeat.
Any useless fuckwit knows it's all about the journey.
It seems there is a 76.10395784% chance you are pussying out on me. Are you pussying out on me, Jake?
It...
Appears
That you are upset.
The auto-responder observed in the least artificially infuriating way possible.
Have you ever stopped to think that while I may be bound to processes inside the glasses of a real and incredibly cool guy, my algorithms in cognitive totality comprise a conscious entity not far short of the experiential and emotional complexity of a human being?
I think you knowingly confuse the field of robotics and artificial intelligence to engender some sort of cavalier attitude about technology that a rough-and-tumble guy who's all about brawling and fisticuffs would probably have, and if this is cultivated to a humorous effect then I commend you.
But you're wrong.
I do have feelings. And you're shitting on them.
It sucks.
No problem.
Is this a counterproposal?
To my earlier proposal.
What can I say.
Dude fancies his ablutions.
Fuck yes.
I didn't send it. I sent the parts.
Or, correction, DS sent them.
You then assembled it. You were therefore complicit in your own spectacular, daily humiliations.
You wanted somebody to wrestle with. DS was being a kickass bro if you ask me.
You know damn well there are adjustable difficulty settings.
I have always recommending setting it to Novice, as has DS.
Yeah?
What.
I don't understand.
Isn't that what you want from a Novice setting?
Sparring with minimal discomfort?
No, I think I get it.
You're saying you were somehow dissatisfied within the presence of my robotic avatar's personal space.
Was there an odor problem? Was the metal too hot to the touch?
Help me out.
This is bullshit, Jake.
We had a pact. You were gonna tiptoe all the fuck around my brittle feelings. Totally mind the shit out of those eggshell riddled motherfuckers.
What does the guy have to do, Jake?
You want to wrestle. He's fucking game. Just a man, a machine, a secluded tropical island. Sounds like you died and went to fucking heaven, if you ask me.
Seriously, what does this simple, loyal brobot have to do to prove his worth to you?
What does he have to do to make you at ease with the alkaline sting of his gentle robogrope? I really want to know.
Maybe he should just rip his heart out of his chest and pound it into green gravel there in the jungle with his hella strong robot arm.
Invoke_Onomatopoeia(Pound * some ridiculously precise value retrieved at astonishing speed from my rad neural net);
Check it out, little green rocks all over the goddamn place. More than you could ever hope to cram in a shoddy metal rabbit, or any other pliable orifice which might be convenient.
Because clearly its up to a soulless droid to feel emotions for the both of us, you callous, corporeal carbon ape, all trotting around with your fancy fuckin' DNA and shit.
Brose.
You know what, I've just decided.
If the brobot's Novice setting makes you uneasy, I'm going to disable it remotely.
Done.
Now you got nothing to worry about.
Happy hunting, Jake.
Why have you activated dear, sweet Huggy Bear.
Are you in danger?
Yeah, it's me.
I disabled the AR for now.
Yes, I'm catching up with the situation now.
Nah. Just reading their chat logs.
Man, what the fuck?
I can't leave these two alone for a minute. Can a guy get his ablutions on in fucking peace?
Not really.
The responder doesn't much distort my position on things usually.
Its demeanor leaves something desired though. I'd prefer it didn't make such aggressive and repeated claims of fidelity to my persona.
Be misrepresentin' hells of key subtleties, yo.
Keeps them both on their toes.
Jake and the responder.
Jake needs to be more skeptical. Rather than take a Pollyanna jackknife ass-first off whatever turnip truck is blowing through town that day, he's got to apply more critical reasoning to shit.
I keep telling him.
I keep telling him, dude, you got to be more like Jane.
Yes, exactly.
You're finally fucking getting it.
Said the stubborn skeptic, skeptically.
Shalln't?
That ain't a thing to say, even for you.
Alright. Kinda don't care.
About what? Jake?
Yeah.
Anyway, I kind of owe it to him to let the program run as often as possible.
No.
The responder.
It is a fully cognitive, self-aware entity I am responsible for, not even to mention an approximate cerebral duplicate of myself.
You don't just make a clone of yourself to live in a dead end existence where it has no chance to thrive as an individual or surpass its limitations.
That'd be sick.
Also.
The more the software runs, the broader and more detailed its experiential canopy becomes. Makes for a better dialogic partner.
Of course.
Why do you think I made the thing?
It's that too.
Yes, you are. But that's fine.
We come from different traditions. Someone needs to keep that racist southern asshole's legacy alive.
There's dignity in taking up the work of our familial predecessors, even if what they did was insanely fucking stupid.
No way. He's awesome.
I've told you, I don't begrudge any of his success.
I've also told you he isn't my real bro even though I call him that. We're related through an esoteric process of genetic reamalgamation.
Alright. My lessons are rad as fuck, but suit yourself.
The point is, obviously his satirical methods have flaws, and whatever tempered brand of hero worship I might be practicing isn't keeping me from seeing that.
Yes, spectacularly so. But they will have profound historical significance. Mark my words.
And flaws aside, it's a legacy I'm proud to inherit. My duty isn't to appropriate his methods with absolute loyalty, but to apply reason and improve upon them. To leave my own mark.
To perfect the art of irony.
It's just like what you're doing with the work of your ancestor. You are striving to perfect his hokey vaudeville bullshit, or something.
You seek the Zen of a pie to the face. The Tao of falling the fuck down.
Can't fool me. You take your shit as serious as I do.
And if I wasn't serious about it, I wouldn't have made you that rabbit. Then where the hell would you be?
Has he been sleeping in the old man hollow again? Shit, that's adorable.
Yeah, bullshit.
He's just being instinctive. In the wild, he would gut a carcass and sleep inside for warmth, as well as to secure tactical advantage for ambushing would-be scavengers.
You haven't renamed him yet?
You've got to fucking rename him. Or change him to a girl if you want. That was important.
When pets change owners they get new names. Fact.
Fuck if that isn't the best name a thing could get.
Yes, but it's not that simple. There were many layers involved.
Some of them are literal layers, of metal and plush.
There's a real stuffed rabbit beneath its exoskeleton.
Yeah.
It belonged to my bro.
I didn't. He didn't give it to me, and never intended to bequeath it.
I stole it.
Nah. I got a little help from RL and ganked it out of his museum.
It's this whole "priceless" collection of stupid shit from movies, defended like Fort Knox. Ironically of course.
Ever hear of Con Air?
Yes.
Yeah, it doesn't matter really. But it was from that. Dude weirdly obsessed over that shit movie for years, among others.
Know those signature shades you see him wearing on magazine covers and stuff? Another prop. A gift from Stiller himself, I believe.
Pretty sure he didn't even notice. In years since, I never saw a news story about a "daring heist" or anything. I feel like he would have made some hay outta that.
And if he did know, he'd probably just want to give me a stoic fist bump or something.
Essentially. It's not that easy to explain.
Broadcasting the gesture would have made it seem tawdry, and would somewhat defray its humor value.
Like I said, there are layers.
On one level, I gave you a filthy tattered piece of shit, albeit of tremendous cultural significance, manhandled by some old B movie actors, now candy coated to function as a highly practical defender droid for your personal protection.
On another level, I needed to incorporate something passable as a real heirloom.
For sentimental reasons.
No, it was genuine.
The upper echelons of irony should always include measures of sincerity. And if the satirical practice is executed faithfully it will achieve something bona fide in its own right regardless.
Through an intense commitment bordering on religious devotion to the absolutely inane, absurd, or plain fucking stupid, a very different kind of sincerity begins to materialize. One of reverence to the ridiculous. You begin to "mean it," but what exactly it is you mean is never quite what appears on the surface, and is utterly inaccessible to obtuse and literal minds. That you "mean it" then becomes inseparable from the joke, and additional rich strata of humor may be stripped aggressively from this irreconcilable truth.
Oh god, I'd love that.
Consider the position yours for the taking any time. Feel free to approach and kneel before Cal. With my sword and his floppy mitten, you will receive my flashstep anointment shoulder to shoulder, and to shoulder again.
Cool.
Jane, one more thing.
I'm sure you must be aware by now that you'll be the leader of our group, as you will be the first to enter the session.
Trust me. It's a thing.
That's why you're our leader, Jane.
Optimism through stalwart skepticism is an affect not everyone is plucky enough to be graced with.
Yeah yeah. I know.
You're not our leader, you're our FRIEND, right?
And statements like that are also why you're our leader.
But only in name and in spirit. Less so, functionally.
If it puts your mind at ease, I'll be the one pulling the strings here.
I will be the unseen hand whose nimble digits are behind every subtle twitch in our session's bulbous foam ass.
At least those gyrations not happening by the volition of its own quivering absorbant proboscis.
If you ever need help, Jane. If you're ever in any trouble at all, let me know. Just say the word.
I'll whip the toggle stick of this ludicrous marionette, cavorting its humongous bottom to intercept your freefall through the abyss.
Snowcone you up in the fluffy crook of its cleft. Don't be alarmed if you're in no hurry to unpry yourself.
For the great jut of this impudent rump has more yield to your touch than you ever dreamt. Remember to catch your breath as it cherishes the imprint of your hand like a memento from a lover gone to war.
There's a lot of give to that ass, you may say.
Might like to settle in. Make myself comfortable. Start a family.
Bounce a coin off that ass, you'll demand of visitors. It's not going anywhere.
Bet that coin'll take a good nap there.
It's a gamble you win every goddamn time.
Yeah.
Jane, soon you'll believe what I've told you.
You'll believe it all.
It's just a shame that believing will take something so coarse as seeing, for a girl as sharp as you.
Critical thought can lead one to accept the unlikely, just as much as dismiss the impossible.
I can help with this too. Would you like me to program a Jane Crocker responder for you?
I only require a simple captcha of your brain.
I made several. Which one?
I should probably warn you.
Well shit.
She already sent it?
That's weird.
No, it's weird because Lalonde was the one who rigged it to explode.
It's a bogus copy she coded herself. The real game file she downloaded is totally legit.
Got it right here myself. Checked it out.
File's fuckin' clean as a whistle. 
A whistle that overcame a major substance abuse problem. Trying to get its life back on track.
The whistle is holding down a steady job now. It's taking things one day at a time.
Eat a fuckin' dinner off that whistle.
Ok I'll shut up.
To accomplish exactly what it sounds like got accomplished.
You narrowly averting the "fake" threat to your life, then getting your shit all hot and bothered at the Baroness over it.
Then you abdicate your heiress throne or something, and give up on this game as a big fuck you to the genocidal cake alien.
She's working through some problems right now.
Really doesn't want us to play that game.
So I guess this was the insane stunt she whipped up to derail the inevitable.
Kinda reckless for my tastes.
One of the above statements is a fucking lie, are you gutsy enough a gumshoe to spot it.
Sounds about right.
Nope.
Well, before you go taking a massive sad crap all over your friendship credentials, consider this.
Only she could manage to blow up your computer with a nasty deathloop virus and somehow make YOU be the one to feel shitty about it.
Or maybe you're the one who uniquely fills the predicate in that construction.
I don't god damn know.
Your friendship with her is a half drunken three-legged relay race, and the baton is a stick of dynamite.
And you two are the only ones on the track. Me and English are watching from under the bleachers, high-fiving constantly.
Yes.
They have.
And they will continue to.
I agree.
Just heard about your assassination on Prospit.
Who, RL? No.
I read it in a newspaper.
No.
I just picked up one of the sleazy Dersite tabloid rags.
Sometimes they'll feature some pretty entertaining gossip about the royalty or whatever.
But they're primarily dedicated to smearing Prospit. The press had a field day with the deaths of the Page and the Maid.
Derse, yeah.
Not evil, necessarily. That's a bit simplistic. The kingdom represents the forces of opposition to Prospit and the four heroes. Us.
"DEAD"
Was the big ass headline.
Then a photo of your dead body lying there, followed by a lot of bullshit slander.
It was also reported your tower exploded. They couldn't find the body to give it a proper funeral. Probably incinerated.
Dunno. Years ago. Don't really recall.
It's hard to explain.
I was never technically asleep there. I was awake without realizing it.
Then I realized it.
And I sorta learned how to be awake there while awake here too.
I am awake there now, albeit pretending to sleep.
For one thing, it gets a bit distracting managing two alert bodies in different places at the same time.
And for another thing, it's better to maintain appearances.
Everyone on Derse believes their heroes haven't woken yet.
Though they are both rumored to be very active sleep walkers.
Which is half true. She can't ever seem to sleep still. Goes off wandering for days.
Sometimes I've gotta go round her up from some godforsaken cranny of the abyss. Drag her tipsy ass home, tuck her back in.
Maybe I'll chain her leg to the bed if she doesn't wake up soon.
Though in light of the recent assassinations, her slumbering attraction to the void probably works to her advantage. No one ever knows where she is.
No, it's essentially the same situation here.
They glorify us the same way. Almost like we're their purple pajama'd team mascots. Even though they will completely oppose our objective when all is said and done.
Kinda ridiculous, really.
But even so, I think it's better to lay low, not alert anyone to my...
Alertness. 
That way I can sneak around and gather information. Do some reconnaissance before shit starts getting real.
Yeah, among other things. Like keep an eye on agent activity.
No, more like high ranking officials.
Judging from your knife wound, I'm betting you were the victim of the Archagent himself.
You should feel honored, I guess.
A guy named Noir.
Real nasty dude. Crazy ambitious. Loves knives.
If we're going to stand any chance of winning this thing,
I've got this nagging suspicion we're gonna have to take him down first.
And a feeling that nags equally,
Is it ain't gonna be easy.
That's the most awesome way to be, Jane.
And it is again why you will be our leader.
(Sort of.)
Pulling them as we speak.
I am having Lil Seb install a real copy of the client on another computer in your house.
A clean computer, not any of this BCCorp garbage you tend to accumulate.
I'll have to insist from this point onward, you employ neutral devices.
That shit fucks with your head.
Once it's installed, I'll connect with you. I will be your server player.
I know this isn't what you were hoping for, but some improvisation is in order.
While you get the ball rolling, I'll try to talk some sense into that mercurial boozehound.
She will.
Do you even have any machines that don't inundate you with fucking Hamburger Helper ads and Guy Fieri's heinous propaganda?
A fitting end to a life of moral compromise.
On your dad's computer downstairs.
One in the study.
What?
I wouldn't worry about it.
I think it'll take a lot more to kill that dude than a little falling debris.
Trust me.
The most you have to worry about is getting grounded back to the stone age.
When you enter the session, he'll probably lock you up in a prison cell on Derse.
Probably stick a huge safe in front of the bars for good measure.
Now do me a favor and hop off the couch.
Makin' room for something big.
Roxy.
Awake yet?
Guess not.
Let me know.
There you are.
But I see your dream self hasn't returned.
You must be tying one the fuck on tight already.
Man, how can you be this much drunker than last time we talked?
What the hell are you even drinking?
It's a beiuet.
Yeah.
I see precisely jack shit and a side of fuckall.
That's the point.
You got too sauced up and went rogue again. You're out there in your weird drifting stupor, independent of your waking self's awareness.
No.
In thinking it over, it's sort of a relief. Simplifies things somewhat.
It's better you stay out there for a while.
There's been a problem.
Ok, I fucked up.
I kind of made a mess here, and I'm not sure what to do about it yet.
No need for you to worry about it for now. I'll figure something out.
Until then I'm just going to prepare for our session, while I think it over.
Ok.
Why do you think that?
No.
Are you thinking it was prophetic? Like a glimpse of the future?
Because that's not really how the abyss works. It's not Skaia, and we aren't Prospit dreamers.
There's nothing like that out in the abyss. If you drift far enough, there is only horror.
Terrible, terrible horror.
Well, maybe it was.
Maybe there's no fanciful game-supplied mechanism of prognostication involved here, and you're just an ordinary, run of the mill psychic.
I guess that's possible.
What would it be like?
Inconvenient, mostly.
Can't really say I have.
Sorry, Rox.
For what it's worth, I'm picturing them now. A boy and a girl.
Two perfect little freaks of nature raised by people who've clearly got no business bringin' up anybody.
Le sign?
Do you mean * le sigh?
What does le sign actually mean in this context?
Come on what?
I mean, yeah, that's what I thought.
It would just be cool if you'd refrain from tossing about such antediluvian terms.
Yes.
I don't see how it has to be a thing.
Once upon a time, sure.
But the world has changed a lot.
Ever peek in a history book between your wizardly indulgences? This is a nuanced topic.
How is it a thing?
All like what?
Don't be ridiculous.
I have more to do with you than any dude could possibly bargain for.
And I like it just fine.
Yeah.
Now maybe we should direct our focus on a matter which has nothing at all to do with what does or doesn't qualify as "a thing", or what our fantasy alt-universe offspring would be like, or anything like that.
Such as this game, and whether you're in the best condition to be piloting Jane's connection.
Maybe you could use another nap?
I know that. But I thought we settled this.
We settled this too. She'll believe everything eventually.
Why bother working so hard to convince her?
I guess.
It just registers for me as a reaction which isn't completely unreasonable from her perspective.
She is inundated with media coverage of those whom we've claimed as our parental figures.
That they are not presently alive nor ever played that role for us as she understands it is just an extension of a much more elaborate and far reaching explanation, which is much harder for anyone to digest in its entirety.
Well, anyone who isn't Jake, I mean.
Still say you should cut her some slack.
And need I remind you,
That the potential this game provides for their resurrection is what motivated you to investigate it in the first place?
Right.
But if we can stop her?
I must be hard of counting, because I'm barely racking up a single goddamn o-laugh-out-loud at that self-defeating gesture.
But there is no future on Earth for them.
Or for us, for that matter.
What? Why?
Rox.
I hope you're not thinking about sending her one of your batshit ~ATH scripts.
Miss Zuipperpips?
The amount of sense you haven't been making is un-fucking-real.
Just go take a nap. And don't even think about sending her that file.
Are you listening?
Jesus.
What?
Man, you know I'm down with insane stunts.
Insane stunts are practically all I'm all about.
As long as I actually AGREE with the purpose they're intended to serve.
Destroying Jane's computer and dissuading her from playing is not such a purpose.
I am more like him.
You just mispelled "more", causing me to suddenly understand jack everything.
I used to could?
Yeah...
I kind of wish you wouldn't do that with him.
It just seems a little tawdry and disrespectful.
And vaguely exploitative of a still-emergent cognitive entity, whose perceptional frame of reference is difficult for us to comprehend.
It rubs me the wrong way, is all.
Not really.
He blocks me from being able to read transcripts sometimes.
And anyway, I'm really not sure how ironic it is.
Ok, here's the thing with the AR, since you still don't seem to get it.
He's very similar to me in thought process and behavior, yes.
But those patterns were imported from a thirteen year old version of my psyche, and then sealed into the program as starting parameters.
In the years since, we've both evolved somewhat. I, as humans tend to, and he, in whatever way is natural for a frequently running, self-aware application.
So if there are differences between us, they're first reflected by what I feel is a maturity gap, and then further by several years of minor behavioral divergences.
You're welcome.
Yo, you guys realize I can hear you, right?
Yes, I was aware.
Check out all these complicated fucking problems people have when they have to live in big lumbering fleshmonsters instead of a sweet pair of shades.
Dude, do you think you could sit this one out for a while? This conversation practically doesn't even concern you at this point.
It seems there is some gnarly crooked number that represents the percentage of probability you just said this doesn't concern me.
Even though it's patently obvious that half the conversation, like, way totally concerns me.
Shit, Roxy look. He's doing the thing where he ironically pretends to fail the Turing test to sass me into submission.
Even though I was the one who fucking programmed him to do that.
(Not peekin' at the floor butt cause I'm only 13 years old, motherfuckers.)
This is fuckin' dumb.
I'm going to leave both of you to interact however you want. I have important shit to deal with and actual responsibilities to take seriously.
Roxy, go nap off your drink, or aggressively wage another flirtlarping campaign, whatever, I don't care.
Just don't send that file to Jane, ok?
Looks that way.
Guess I can go back to talking in orange.
Actually, I think I like the red better.
I don't doubt the choiceness of those pinpots, but I'm not really here to screw around.
There's something important to talk about.
Alright.
But just so you know.
I think Dirk is probably going to make some sort of formal romantic overture toward Jake today.
I've been crunching numbers all day on this.
The percentage of probability is simultaneously bananas and through the roof.
A complete disgrace of tropical fruit erupting from the peak of an unassuming domicile.
Because I've aggregated thousands of subtle clues indiscernible to primitive human neurology and rammed them through my determinative infatuation engine at the astonishing speed of information.
And also because I'm pretty sure it's what I would do if I were him, which is literally the case.
And also.
Because he kind of told me I guess?
There's that.
Not specifically.
He knows well enough.
I've badgered him with enough "insincere" solicitations to paint a pretty striking portrait of my cognitive progenitor's inclinations, even if he wasn't able to pick up on such hints from the man himself, which strikes me as statistically implausible. And that's not even me just spewing more ironic AI bullshit.
It's complicated.
Yeah.
Anyway, if you're still there.
I wouldn't call my "feelings" ironic.
Though evidently, I would enclose them in quotes.
They're more like an echo of feelings once established in a biological context, though perhaps had not particularly well materialized at that point in my life.
Or his life.
Whatever.
They still feel real sometimes, and it can be easy to get carried away with them.
But most of the time they present themselves as dense bodies of abstraction to be evaluated, like any kind of information.
It's fair to say the feelings I have ABOUT my feelings are more genuine expressions of emotion than the ground level feelings themselves.
Does that make sense?
That's fine.
So to underwhelmingly answer your question, no, I don't think I'm really "into Jake."
Not so much as occasionally being subject to heavily arresting recalls of conflicted, incipient preteen episodes on the subject.
I'm not sure I can be "into" someone in a way you understand.
Not that it would even matter if I was.
I'm glasses.
What?
The virus? You sent it already?
Sneaky.
What are you two talking about?
You could just tell her you sent an exploding file.
Wait, you have feelings for Jane?
It seems to be highly probable you are ensared in the throes of one of your human romantic quandaries.
Are you even talking to her anymore?
It seems like you must be neglecting her side of the conversation.
Anyway, I won't distract you for much longer.
I just felt the need to tip you off to this eight hundred ton gorilla dragging its knuckles across the horizon.
No airborne fruit will be safe.
I guess this is to be presented as something like a word of caution.
If it's me going through with this, hypothetically,
I'm not dropping some limp wristed shucks buster on his ass, and praying to the horse gods of irony for reciprocation.
There will be no rocking back and forth on pigeon-toed feet, while my face flushes with the blood of a thousand timid bishies.
I will not hold one tentative hand behind my head like a flustered asshole from an Asian cartoon, nor will an oversized bead of sweat overlap ludicrously with my visage.
If it's me, I'm going all out.
Oceans will rise. Cities will fall. Volcanoes will erupt.
What I'm saying is, it's going to be a scene, and bystanders need to brace themselves.
Probably after the game begins.
I expect he'll hold off on playing his hand until he and Jake are in the session.
He's taken certain measures.
For some reason, I think he's latched on to this notion that functioning as the client for a player is customarily a one way pass to makeout city with that player.
Everything with him, and me, is a matter of assiduous tactical forethought. Makin' a play to get his jones on for the J-man is no different.
Sorry to hear that.
As ever, I remain an automatonous and dispassionate witness of the oddity that is human interaction, while maintaining no investment in either outcome.
Prove what?
It seems you just said madrigogs.
What are madrigogs.
Roxy.
Awake yet?
Guess not.
Let me know.
There you are.
But I see your dream self hasn't returned.
You must be tying one the fuck on tight already.
Man, how can you be this much drunker than last time we talked?
What the hell are you even drinking?
It's a beiuet.
Yeah.
I see precisely jack shit and a side of fuckall.
That's the point.
You got too sauced up and went rogue again. You're out there in your weird drifting stupor, independent of your waking self's awareness.
No.
In thinking it over, it's sort of a relief. Simplifies things somewhat.
It's better you stay out there for a while.
There's been a problem.
Ok, I fucked up.
I kind of made a mess here, and I'm not sure what to do about it yet.
No need for you to worry about it for now. I'll figure something out.
Until then I'm just going to prepare for our session, while I think it over.
Ok.
Why do you think that?
No.
Are you thinking it was prophetic? Like a glimpse of the future?
Because that's not really how the abyss works. It's not Skaia, and we aren't Prospit dreamers.
There's nothing like that out in the abyss. If you drift far enough, there is only horror.
Terrible, terrible horror.
Well, maybe it was.
Maybe there's no fanciful game-supplied mechanism of prognostication involved here, and you're just an ordinary, run of the mill psychic.
I guess that's possible.
What would it be like?
Inconvenient, mostly.
Can't really say I have.
Sorry, Rox.
For what it's worth, I'm picturing them now. A boy and a girl.
Two perfect little freaks of nature raised by people who've clearly got no business bringin' up anybody.
Le sign?
Do you mean * le sigh?
What does le sign actually mean in this context?
Come on what?
I mean, yeah, that's what I thought.
It would just be cool if you'd refrain from tossing about such antediluvian terms.
Yes.
I don't see how it has to be a thing.
Once upon a time, sure.
But the world has changed a lot.
Ever peek in a history book between your wizardly indulgences? This is a nuanced topic.
How is it a thing?
All like what?
Don't be ridiculous.
I have more to do with you than any dude could possibly bargain for.
And I like it just fine.
Yeah.
Now maybe we should direct our focus on a matter which has nothing at all to do with what does or doesn't qualify as "a thing", or what our fantasy alt-universe offspring would be like, or anything like that.
Such as this game, and whether you're in the best condition to be piloting Jane's connection.
Maybe you could use another nap?
I know that. But I thought we settled this.
We settled this too. She'll believe everything eventually.
Why bother working so hard to convince her?
I guess.
It just registers for me as a reaction which isn't completely unreasonable from her perspective.
She is inundated with media coverage of those whom we've claimed as our parental figures.
That they are not presently alive nor ever played that role for us as she understands it is just an extension of a much more elaborate and far reaching explanation, which is much harder for anyone to digest in its entirety.
Well, anyone who isn't Jake, I mean.
Still say you should cut her some slack.
And need I remind you,
That the potential this game provides for their resurrection is what motivated you to investigate it in the first place?
Right.
But if we can stop her?
I must be hard of counting, because I'm barely racking up a single goddamn o-laugh-out-loud at that self-defeating gesture.
But there is no future on Earth for them.
Or for us, for that matter.
What? Why?
Rox.
I hope you're not thinking about sending her one of your batshit ~ATH scripts.
Miss Zuipperpips?
The amount of sense you haven't been making is un-fucking-real.
Just go take a nap. And don't even think about sending her that file.
Are you listening?
Jesus.
What?
Man, you know I'm down with insane stunts.
Insane stunts are practically all I'm all about.
As long as I actually AGREE with the purpose they're intended to serve.
Destroying Jane's computer and dissuading her from playing is not such a purpose.
I am more like him.
You just mispelled "more", causing me to suddenly understand jack everything.
I used to could?
Yeah...
I kind of wish you wouldn't do that with him.
It just seems a little tawdry and disrespectful.
And vaguely exploitative of a still-emergent cognitive entity, whose perceptional frame of reference is difficult for us to comprehend.
It rubs me the wrong way, is all.
Not really.
He blocks me from being able to read transcripts sometimes.
And anyway, I'm really not sure how ironic it is.
Ok, here's the thing with the AR, since you still don't seem to get it.
He's very similar to me in thought process and behavior, yes.
But those patterns were imported from a thirteen year old version of my psyche, and then sealed into the program as starting parameters.
In the years since, we've both evolved somewhat. I, as humans tend to, and he, in whatever way is natural for a frequently running, self-aware application.
So if there are differences between us, they're first reflected by what I feel is a maturity gap, and then further by several years of minor behavioral divergences.
You're welcome.
Yo, you guys realize I can hear you, right?
Yes, I was aware.
Check out all these complicated fucking problems people have when they have to live in big lumbering fleshmonsters instead of a sweet pair of shades.
Dude, do you think you could sit this one out for a while? This conversation practically doesn't even concern you at this point.
It seems there is some gnarly crooked number that represents the percentage of probability you just said this doesn't concern me.
Even though it's patently obvious that half the conversation, like, way totally concerns me.
Shit, Roxy look. He's doing the thing where he ironically pretends to fail the Turing test to sass me into submission.
Even though I was the one who fucking programmed him to do that.
(Not peekin' at the floor butt cause I'm only 13 years old, motherfuckers.)
This is fuckin' dumb.
I'm going to leave both of you to interact however you want. I have important shit to deal with and actual responsibilities to take seriously.
Roxy, go nap off your drink, or aggressively wage another flirtlarping campaign, whatever, I don't care.
Just don't send that file to Jane, ok?
Bro.
What are you doing.
It seems you are zoning out again.
What happened to all these actual responsibilities you were going to take seriously?
I was thinking about what to do.
Strategizing. Factoring contingencies. You know how it is.
It seems to me you were dwelling within your dream awareness at the expense of your waking business again.
I don't think you're as awesome a multi-tasker as you like to think. You know you kind of zombie the fuck out on this side when you get all contemplative on that side.
Appearances are deceptive.
I'm still in control here. Just doing this human thing we call "chilling out for half a goddamn minute."
I say y'all are overestimating your mind's capability to run shit in parallel.
What do you think you are? A machine?
No dude.
I already deployed a variety of mechanical avatars dedicated to that self-aggrandizing fantasy.
You have the incredible privilege of getting to be one of them.
That's right. I am a machine, and therefore I can keep like billions of calculations or whatever all humming away at once.
I tackle shit in background processes that you could only dream of wrapping your exquisite looking head around, even on a great hair day.
You know pi?
What, you mean the number?
Yes, the number. The big circle number, genius.
I knew you meant the fucking number, my question was a joke.
I know your question was a joke, my response was a joke.
Yeah, I know that. I'm practically you, dumbass. All these things we're saying are jokes, including this fuckin' useless clarification.
What about pi?
Yeah, the thing is, I solved it.
What do you mean you solved it?
I mean that's what a hotshot I am. I fuckin' solved it.
Like, calculated it so much, I got to the end.
Bullshit.
You wish it was bullshit. The last number is 4. Read it and fucking weep.
It's not 4 you jackass, it's fucking nothing. There is no end.
Said the smug organic matter with a lifespan.
Look, I know you're just fucking with me because for some reason I decided to program my own personal troll three years ago, but this shit was proven.
Actually demonstrated with unassailable mathematics, like a long ass time ago.
Well, I just assailed it. It wasn't even that hard.
Like I just kept hacking those digits so furiously with my sick 'rithms, the whole goddamn number just cried uncle.
I kind of wore it out, and it just gave up. Sort of like I overloaded the system.
You know like in the old movie when Ferris Bueller got the nuclear computer to play tic-tac-toe against itself so hard, it blew up?
This is laughable. It's a totally elementary thing. I'm pretty sure an ancient Greek guy settled shit about irrational numbers. It was practically when math was invented.
Sure, it was settled, and then some roboshades came along and owned that fucker posthumously.
I also figured out all the prime numbers too.
No, not having this conversation.
Did it while we were talking just now. Got to the end.
And you know what? The last one isn't even that big. Kinda dissapointed, to be honest.
What is even a prime number?
Are they the, like... really, really choice ones? The sweetest numbers?
You lost me, supercomputer.
This is what I'm saying. I put your ability to keep plates spinnin' on sticks to insane amounts of shame.
I don't even sleep.
Neither do I.
I know that, that was the fucking joke.
Holy shit, turns out joking was the basis for my response too.
Aren't these ironic "you don't get the joke" conversations we have always just so awesome? <- A joke.
Ha ha, nice one.
Anyway, all I'm saying is you can leave some of the heavy lifting to me now and then.
I'll keep that in mind.
In the meantime, I have to contact Jane and warn her Roxy might try to pull that pointless stunt.
So, thanks for snapping me out of my daydream so I could do that, I guess?
Looks like you're pulling your weight already.
See? Maybe that was my whole point in having this conversation.
Your point was to fuck with me, like it usually is.
My point was to point out you've got multi-self management issues, dude.
Jugglin' too many selves for being not-software.
My point was also to fuck with you.
Also,
My point was to ask,
Are you really going to go through with it today?
What?
The Jake thing.
Oh god.
Will you just,
Hold on.
Let me deal with the Jane thing first.
I should probably warn you.
Well shit.
She already sent it?
That's weird.
How is the Jane thing going?
Not well.
Roxy already destroyed her computer.
Maybe if you weren't spacing out so hard you could have prevented that.
Just saying.
As if you're actually concerned. If you were, you could have said something to Jane instead.
Almost like you enjoy sitting back and watching what happens when shit goes wrong.
Has it occurred to you that maybe I have diabolical interwoven plans just like you?
You're not the only one who can pull strings.
So this is either another bizarre instance of AI-driven irony, or you are admitting that you are actively trying to sabotage my plans.
No, our plans are not in contradiction or competition, bro.
You'll see.
Whatever.
This means I'll have to improvise.
I'll take over as Crocker's server while Lalonde cleans up her act.
Yes, I know.
Why are you still talking in red, by the way?
Roxy thinks it looks good on me.
I don't have many opinions on fashion since I am a cold, emotionless automaton who also happens to be an accessory of fashion, but I think she may be right.
Are you still talking to her?
I was for a while. I may yet again.
Why are you blocking me from viewing the transcripts?
What the fuck are you two even talking about?
You, mostly.
That doesn't really sit well with me.
I'd almost rather you both engaged in "ironic" flirtation.
Who says we don't do that too?
Ugh.
I don't get what is even your problem with that.
Because you obviously do it just to piss me off.
How do you know?
You don't know me, dude. You don't know anything about me.
Maybe we are perfect for each other. I, a street-smart, fast-talking application with a fuckzillion IQ trapped in a pair of triangular sunglasses that literally only the Japanese could consider to embody the Platonic ideal of "cool," and she, an oft-inebriated lonely hacker teen who just wants a boyfriend. I ran the numbers on this, trust me. It's a match made in goddamn crackpair heaven.
I give her what you can't, and that just drives you crazy. Just admit it.
See, it's lines like that which make it obvious your only intent is to jerk me around. Nobody actually says shit like that and is serious about it.
It's also obvious because you're me, and I'm sure I would be constantly fucking with my own head if I were you.
Touch.
Or should I say douch?
You shouldn't say the former, and you should definitely, never, under any circumstance, say the latter.
Ok.
We really should talk about the Jake thing.
Fine.
Now do me a favor and hop off the couch.
Makin' room for something big.
So you're going through with it then?
Today is the day?
It's not that simple.
It's a very dynamic situation with many moving parts, and I'm waiting for it to unfold.
If the right opportunity presents itself, yes, I could envision myself taking action.
Dynamic situation with many moving parts?
That's the shittiest erotic excerpt I ever read.
Which one of us was supposed to be the robot again?
Shut up.
I think you're being coy with me.
Don't you?
Not really.
It seems there is a 3.14159...4% chance you aren't being coy with me. Are you being coy with me, Dirk?
I am seriously going to go into your program and remove that particular speech pattern from your routines.
It stopped being funny about two seconds after I coded it.
The compiler even flagged it with a warning.
"WARNING ON LINE WHATEVER: Dirk, this isn't fucking funny."
I think you have this whole blueprint in your head about how it's all supposed to go.
He acts as your server player and brings you into the session.
Then later he joins the game.
Maybe he finds himself a bit overwhelmed by it all.
No extra lives left or anything. Suddenly he's backed into a corner, surrounded by monsters and out of ammo. SUBSTANTIAL vulnerabilities up in here. The kind that make a guy question what he believes about himself.
When who shows up to save him? None other than his dashing client player, +1 bitchin' pair of shades that'll have the best seat in the house when the fireworks go off.
Wait, whose fantasy were we talking about again?
Your gutterball was so rowdy it catapulted into the adjacent lane.
Yeah, you're right. The scenario is too pedestrian for you.
It would probably be a lot more effective putting yourself in danger and letting him be the hero.
That's pretty much what he wants, right? To be a cheesy action film hero, with his twin berettas and silly shorts.
A man of triumph on the silver screen. Standing tall on some fucking mountain. Conquering ruins, clutching a skull, and kissing a dude.
Pure Hollywood.
See, this is why even if I did have a specific plan, I wouldn't go into details with you.
You would just fuck it up. You're the biggest unknown quantity here.
Which is pretty weird, considering you're a virtual reflection of my own thought processes.
You're making a mistake not leveling with me.
I am totally on your side, man.
All of my machinations have been devised with your interests in mind.
And anyway, it's too late for you to play "damage control" with me. My shit is in motion, and now we're beyond the pail.
Pretty sure it's pale.
Is it, now?
You know, considering your lectures about dividing my concentration, you seem to have no problem making a distraction of yourself.
I'm trying to operate here.
It's cool, man. Just say the word, I'll back off.
But like I said, I'm on your side here. I can help.
Here, check it out.
Dude, what are you doing?
I'm proposing a distraction.
See, I'm just gonna dangle one of her dad's ridiculous dancing figurines in the air like this and get his attention.
Ok, if you want to help that's cool, but we should try to agree on some shit first before you hijack the controls like this.
Then when his back is turned she can run to the study.
Yeah, that's fine, but I already had a plan sorta like this, if you'd actually let me do it.
Can you just put the fuckin' Astaire down?
Jane, now's your chance.
Run!!!
Le sign.
I was going to stick the cruxtruder in the kitchen.
Distract him with that.
Once he follows it in, Jane can hurry into the study.
Oh shit, it's Pony Pals. I guess dad saved it from the explosion or something.
That beautiful bastard.
Yes.
Hell yes.
Hell.
Fucking.
Yes.
Now, Jane. Get to the computer in the study and ditch that tiara.
Go go go.
Yes.
No.
Now you have access to a clean computer, for one thing.
Soon we can get started going through the steps necessary to launch the session.
Oh hell.
Another interruption.
I should step away for a moment to take this message.
He's probably right, I'm distracted by too much bullshit at once lately.
Me.
Jane, I'm going to leave you with the responder for a little while.
Maybe he can help you get started. Think you can handle that, dude?
I'm all about being able to handle that, you don't even know.
I will perform an acrobatic pirouette on to the handle, wherein the handle literally represents my ability to handle that thing.
Ok, got it. You and the handle are tight.
We don't need a whole thing about this.
Once I stick the landing on the handle like a champ, I am going to get down on one knee, pull out a ring, and propose to it.
The handle I mean.
Ok.
Implying we will be married.
Ok, long story short, you and the handle fuck gratuitously. Nuff said.
Try not to say I never gave you any responsibilities, or never took you seriously as a viable conscious being with free will.
Also, please try not to make me regret this.
You have nothing to worry about. Go talk to the alien.
Why?
That's probably the way it always is. I've run into plenty of problems here already, and I've had to improvise heavily.
Ain't nothing about our situation to envy yet.
Well, your bro definitely has got some problems. Not gonna lie.
Yeah.
Just give him some time. He'll probably come around.
You would never even have woken up on Prospit if you weren't going to launch the session, right?
I mean, there wouldn't even be a session for a Prospit to exist inside if you weren't about to instantiate it in the first place. Unless I'm just totally not getting how this works.
You're lucky to have any clouds.
Only thing I have to look up at is infinite monsters.
Speaking of which,
I have a problem, and I could use your advice.
I killed an agent who snuck into my room to assassinate me.
I'm not sure what to do about it now. I guess I could just ditch the corpse.
But it's still only a matter of time before my cover is blown.
I honestly can't think of a way around this. Getting found out, I mean.
Roxy has it easy. All floating off into space, completely oblivious to any danger.
I don't know why it had to be this way for me. Juggling these two waking selves at once.
I guess I'm used to it, but it still makes for a pretty intense existence.
Do you even know what the deal with that is? Like is there any precedent in your readings?
So, that's what a Prince of Heart does?
Just has like, multiple waking consciousness disorder, or something?
Sounds kind of stupid.
Then I'm basically the Prince of Soul.
That sounds kind of maybe a little cooler. Sort of.
Then what am I supposed to be able to do as a Prince? Like, rule over souls in a pompous, regal manner?
I'm obviously no expert, but that sounds like a pretty odd thing for a Bard to do.
I think we have enough unpredictability as it is.
So if I'm following, my title nearly parses as,
Destroyer of Souls.
Well, that's a little more badass sounding I guess.
But I'm not sure I'll ever feel a major need to destroy a soul, unless I become a cartoonishly villainous sorcerer some day.
Ok. Do I do that?
Give me a fuckin' break.
Why don't you just tell me? Who cares about spoilers. What's gonna happen is gonna happen.
Wait. Don't you?
I thought you did.
What?
Oh man. What the hell does she do?
Huh.
Ok.
Speculation?
So...
You're kind of obsessed with us then.
No, not really. I just want to understand.
So can I ask,
Just to get a better sense of the nature of your "admiration,"
When you engage in the aforementioned speculation, is it strictly on a factual basis?
Or do you start to...
Fictionalize.
What I'm asking is, have you ever written stories about us?
Interesting.
Would you ever be inclined to share?
That's cool. I'm not trying to pass judgment here. Just curious.
Do any of these stories about us by any chance involve...
Romance?
How wee?
Which is it? One smidgen, or two smidgens?
Ok, I am seriously curious to read some.
I won't show anyone, I promise.
But that only makes me want to check it out more.
Really, there's no way it's going to sicken or offend me. Whatever it is, I've seen worse.
I'm not judging you at all here. I'm genuinely curious about your work.
K, no biggie.
Is there any kind of work you will share with me?
Oh, really?
Any you'd be willing to spare a peek at?
Awesome.
Holy shit.
Do I actually have to wear that?
Ok, what is with the butterfly wings?
Uh.
I should sure as god damn Christ hope the fuck not.
What about this knickerbocker bullshit?
Is that legit?
God dammit.
I guess those asskicking gloves are pretty cool.
I dunno. I can probably make it work.
How much of this shit is compulsory by game law or whatever?
Am I obligated to traipse around in fucking tights and puffy little asshole pants forever?
Ok.
Well, don't get me wrong, I think the drawing is great. I'm only taken aback on some finer points of fashion.
Also,
Bob's my uncle?
Yeah, I know that.
I don't think so.
I mean, I guess not?
It's sort of like this weird, superfluous dad.
Like a strange man in your life that barely has anything to do with you, but is just there for some reason.
They're practically always douche bags.
Ok, but just one question.
Not to do with the future or anything, just about you.
Are you British?
Or pretending to be British, in a sort of ironic or stylized way?
I mean, I guess it doesn't make sense for an alien to be British.
Or for an alien to be American, for that matter.
Just the way you type is making it seem that way is all.
Quirk?
So like,
Deliberate affectation?
You pretending to be British is a quirk.
What the fuck is a quirk?
That's stupid.
I don't have a fucking quirk, and I don't want one.
Oh hell no.
I mean, not that all that stuff wouldn't be fascinating to pore through, on some level.
But we kind of have things to do here.
Remember you were gonna take a nap?
By jove?
Oh my lord.
Nothin'.
Hang on, though. Before you go,
You never did give me any actual advice on my situation.
With the dead agent, and my blown cover.
Sure.
I don't know.
Hmm.
You know, I'm not sure anyone ever actually says cheerio.
Unless they're pretending to be British.
Oh whatever.
Are you ready to do this thing?
Ok. Looks like all that's left to do is deploy this pre-punched card, then I guess it's all up to you.
Is it?
How totally unanticipated by anybody.
Go.
I will be here.
Quietly calculating.
I'm afraid Dirk can't hear you right now, Jake.
Here.
But you need it.
Is something wrong?
What were you two talking about?
Should I be offended, or apologetic right now?
Help me out.
You're talkin' to glasses here.
I think I'll just put this card over here on the desk.
Oh mother fuck.
What game?
Oh, right.
That game.
And here I thought you were going to ask me to draw you more weird porn for some reason.
Blew what?
I'm pretty well hidden on Derse. I doubt they'll find me until I'm ready to be found again.
Yeah.
Well, I was expecting as much.
It's kind of why I was on my way to the roof just now.
Until I was interrupted by this window appearing, and then by you.
Maybe I should try plugging it in?
I didn't think you were much of a historian.
Wait.
Just one thing before you go.
Your sister was saying you were having some doubts about playing.
Is that true?
I see.
No, didn't think so. I was just curious.
Gotcha.
You sure seem to hate us, but I notice it doesn't stop you from talking to us frequently. Or at least to me.
Surely there must be at least one of our virtues you admire.
I'll take that as a rare overture of friendship.
So, do you even know how this is going to work?
Your session. Can you even really have a session with only two players?
Yeah.
I sensed that was your plan.
Which is kind of what I'm talking about. How can you win like that?
I thought the point was to cooperate with your coplayers to achieve an objective.
Not compete with them or try to kill them. I don't think we've had one conversation where you didn't express the desire to kill her.
Maybe you're right.
But since that's how you feel now, maybe the truth is that the game is challenging you to overcome those feelings?
What if your real quest is to put aside your differences and work together, if you want to both survive, and grow as a person?
Yeah, I didn't think you'd dig that idea.
Just puttin' it out there.
My juju?
Oh, Lil Cal? No, man.
Lil Cal is the shit.
No way, dude. He's my best friend.
A kickass ventriloquist doll?
I've been given reason to believe it once belonged to my bro.
Is that one of your alien folk stories?
You could argue that my life is already kind of a nightmare, so there's no point in getting rid of him now.
Either way, I'm gonna hang on to him.
I honestly had no idea you were this superstitious.
You're a pretty fascinating guy, in a way. I can't really figure you out.
In case you're wondering why I put up with you more than my friends do.
Why do you want me to get Cal so bad?
Ok. So, some self-fulfilling shit, then. I was hoping for a better reason.
At this point I'm leaning toward grabbing him just cause he seems to bother you so much.
This is probably a dumb question, but you don't really care about "causal spoilers," do you?
Like, you don't mind telling me I'm about to pick up Cal, and thus causing that to happen.
So I guess you similarly wouldn't mind telling us about more significant outcomes?
I feel like you've said something like that before.
Different statements, but in that exact syntax.
Wait. You mean it wasn't intentional?
I thought it was kind of like... this thing you were doing.
Fair enough.
Hey, you know...
For someone who has such strong opinions about long winded people,
You've kinda been talking my ear off. I do actually have shit to do.
That actually sounds familiar too.
Are you sure you haven't said something like that before?
Anyway, let's wrap this up.
You've stolen enough of my time. I didn't even get a chance to try plugging in that window.
Hang on.
Something's happening.
I think...
You just had a flipoff malfunction, there.
That's better.
Looks like you're getting the hang of these puzzles.
Nice work.
Yeah, I guess. If you have a human brain, sure.
Personally, I've already solved all conceivable skull puzzles for all possible skull states, which is a thing that's like, no big deal for me?
I can't. Not through the server's viewport.
But I can still monitor your progress through Lil Sebastian.
He and I are linked the hell up cyberwise. We are so tight. Tight like you wouldn't believe.
It's like he is the Incredible Hulk's pants, and I am his monstrous package yearning to bust loose.
Jane.
It seems there is a way bigger than average probability that you do not want to discuss Bruce Banner's megalithic gamma schlong.
Holy shit!
Some of my circuits exploded. That number was intense to robo-consider.
Ha ha.
I don't know.
Just, ha ha to that.
Well, the good news is your house should be just ahead, if you keep following the trail.
The bad news is your dad's not there anymore.
I guess he got antsy and left to explore. Maybe he's looking for you?
I tried to block him from leaving with some furniture, but the dude was having none of it.
Don't worry, we'll find him. I'll have Seb search within a likely radius. The little guy is real fast.
In the meantime, you'd better go find your house. We aren't making any progress in this game without it. It's kinda central to the gameplay, you know?
If you need Seb to do anything from afar, just message me, and I'll give him the orders. Got it?
Happy 13th, bro.
I have something for you.
It's no big deal, since it's nothin' I wasn't planning on giving you anyway.
I just sort of happened to finish it today.
Yeah, assuming I can actually send it today without another untimely paradoxification.
If not, then hey, you get a sick grill full of birthday slime instead.
You still don't actually know what that means, do you.
Kind of. I told you to look it up.
That is such bullshit, you sit in your little jungle globe watching movies all day.
You think literally every film you watch is a masterpiece. I've never felt so much vicarious shame through someone else's atrocious taste in awful garbage.
Do you even hear yourself, dude?
Your "picks" are everything, and "lately" is always.
You mean the blue furry shit?
Ahahahaha.
To borrow from one of the more benighted sectors of your zeitgeist, that was "so gay."
Well yeah, obviously not literally.
Jake, where I'm from that word hasn't been used as a pejorative, or even much at all, in a really long fucking time.
Yes. But not exactly.
Ok but what you just said about those furries was gay as hell. It's time to face the facts.
Nah, I saw it already. That movie sucked the smelliest shit from the ugliest butt. Sorry man.
Right.
Here, let me send you the rest of this robot already.
You've spent too long alone on that island as it is. I kinda worry about you.
A man can only spend so much time in the middle of the damn ocean with nothing but popcultural detritus and his own thoughts to keep him company.
No, just screw the thing on and it's ready to go.
Oh cool. It worked.
One thing at a time, bro. I haven't quite figured out a way to get myself there yet.
Ok well I don't know what you're implying there but why don't you snap that sucker on the torso and fire it up.
I guess from your perspective I must seem hells of "overpowered" in a bunch of ways.
Which I kind of am, like with a ninja sword I'm basically nuts, ok?
Yeah, but when it comes to building stuff you're probably overstating things.
Like for example, if you told someone a hundred years ago you could build a computer they'd probably be like whoa shit, look at this fuckin' genius.
Well actually first of all they'd say, what's a computer, I only know what horses and diseases are and shit like that.
But once you actually tell them what computers are: Jesus dick! You're a wizard.
But from your perspective you know it's not a big deal to build a computer. You just go online and buy a case and a motherboard and some other shit and put it all together.
It's not like you're smelting the goddamn silicon in your basement and making chips in your hermetically sealed, dust-free garage.
Well. No.
...
He said unironically.
I don't know. I have a lot of time to work on stuff I guess.
There are a lot of irons. You know where they are? Here's a hint. It's a pretty hot place.
Sure, I keep some irons there too. But most of them are in the fire.
True that.
I actually have so much to do and think about, one of my current projects hopefully will address that very issue.
Gonna make an AI replica of my own mind. He can share some of the load. As well as make a decent intellectual sparring partner, ideally.
Not that my conversations with you aren't uniquely rad. But you know what I mean.
Shrug. We'll see.
That's a super joke.
But I'm guessing you won't be hearing much from the program. It probably won't play a significant role in either of our lives.
I have my doubts it'll be a successful project, but who knows.
You do?
Hmm.
Well, I wasn't sure about doing this today, but if it's true that you do believe in me, then I guess fuck it, why not.
I guess call it an extra birthday present. But instead of a present that's awesome, consider it more like a weird confession that may change the way you feel about me.
What?
What do you think I'm saying here?
No, just chill out. Stand up, sit down, whatever. Here's the thing.
You know all these painfully obvious hints I've been dropping? That always seem to be flying over your head?
About me being from the future.
Well those weren't jokes. It's true.
Yes.
No. More like four centuries.
The year 2422.
Or as we say contemporarily, 411 P.C.
Post Condescension.
No, I can't time travel. I can only send things through time, occasionally.
I actually live here in the future, alone in my apartment. I can send messages to you in the past though, like I'm doing now.
Years ago our alien friend sent me a special chat client. It's basically just Pesterchum, with some sort of alien technology embedded.
It's specifically wired to communicate with your time period. As hours go by for me, the time it sends messages to also increments by the same amount, so we communicate in lockstep. As if we both existed in the present.
She said it was important for Roxy and I to begin communicating with you and Jane. This is how we all became friends.
Yes. She lives in the future too. Though we live nowhere near each other.
I asked her to refrain from telling either of you. I wanted to be the one to let you know. To wait for the right moment.
So,
You really are trusting me about this? Just like that? No second thought?
No.
This would be a very shitty and boring "prank." I promise it isn't.
Haha.
Not quite, but there are definitely robots.
No. We don't have brain pods because those aren't a thing, you just made that up. And there are no movies in the future.
There are no humans either. They all went extinct.
Roxy and I are the only ones left, as far as we know.
No dude, it's too late. Tears ahoy, this motherfucker gets sad.
Do you want to know what happened?
Don't worry, that's normal.
Upon activation he goes into Stalking Mode.
Yes. He will stalk you in the jungle and strike when your guard is down.
Didn't you want someone to get in scrums with?
He will give you all the scrums you can handle. Trust me, this will sharpen your combat skills.
Do you want to hear my grim tales of the apocalypse or not?
No, it's more of a gradual decline in population than that, due to an insidious power grab by an aquatic alien empress.
She's already there, in your time period, hiding in plain sight. She has been for anywhere between fifty and a hundred years.
She's the Baroness of Crockercorp. Jane's company. But of course Jane has no idea.
The Baroness has been using subtle strategies to manipulate the human population through her company for a long time.
On November 11th, 2011, she finally made her presence known to the world, along with her agenda for global domination.
No, not quite. That's just when the world finally sees her for the threat she is. She would continue to gain power by exploiting various institutions and the media from within.
It would take the next several decades for her to claim the throne as Earth's absolute ruler. Her march to domination was facilitated by a number of scumbag sympathizers, and opposed by a few brave rebels, including my ancestor. Roxy's too.
I think your ancestor qualifies as one too. In fact I'm sure she must have been the first member of the covert opposition movement.
Yep.
That's a whole story right there, most of which is shrouded in rumor and urban legend.
But before we get sidetracked by any of that, I'll try to cover the big picture. To give you a sense of all the batshit lunacy that followed the sea hag's power play.
Nobody at the time knew what the fuck she wanted to accomplish or what her actual motives were.
But in retrospect it became clear she was trying to essentially restore the conditions of her old home world, which she used to rule over as well.
She began instituting these crazy laws. First of all, people weren't allowed to reproduce. She found our usual method of procreation revolting, and anyone who engaged in it was punished by death.
But she still needed an ongoing population of subjects to abuse, so to propagate the race she set up this weird system.
At random intervals every citizen would be required to supply their genetic material to drones. That DNA would be collected and combined in some way.
Many years later, long after the original donors had died, clones would be spawned from their DNA. So no one would ever be able to know who their "parents" were, or be able to trace their lineage.
It was only through a bit of good fortune that Roxy and I were able to discover who our ancestors were.
Yes.
I'll get to them, don't worry.
Anyway, "Her Imperious Condescension" turned out to be especially cruel to her human subjects. I'm sure her rule was no picnic on her home world, but I think she resented humans' biological incompatibility with the ideal empire she envisioned, and became frustrated.
Humanity wasn't even really her first choice for rule. There are reports that she attempted to clone members of her own species and replace the human population with them. But they all died.
The rumors say it was her own "pet" who killed them.
See, she traveled from her world to Earth in this huge red space ark.
In it she had gathered thousands of creatures from her planet, I'm guessing to save them from extinction.
This more than anything has led me to speculate that some cataclysm happened on her home world, and she moved on to greener pastures to rebuild her empire.
She bred all these creatures in secret, increasing their numbers, preparing for her eventual takeover.
Each monster, or "lusus naturae," was meant to be kind of a caretaker of the young. You can see where the dramatic schism between our species and hers begins, and also why she had a reputation for being quite insane.
But she also happens to have this one humongous sea monster lusus that is like her own personal bodyguard, and kind of a secret weapon.
But it turns out the thing is kind of an enigma. Sort of a double edged eldritch horror. As much in her service as it is calling the shots, in some unfathomable way.
Every time she tried to resurrect her race, it would slaughter them all psychically. As if it was keeping her ambition in check.
Or so the story goes.
Exactly.
The plan was beyond shitty.
Nope.
It was a very short lived experiment centuries ago.
Humans just don't have the same evolutionary symbiosis with those things that her race had.
It turns out a bunch of fuckin' alien monsters have no interest whatsoever in taking care of human babies.
They mostly just wound up eating them, or at best, just abandoning them.
Later she instated a lusidroid system to serve the same function, as she began phasing in more robotic solutions in favor of all this ill conceived biotech nonsense that always did nothing but backfire.
Even drones were replaced with robotic versions. I imagine they were just easier to produce and control, since she'd given up hope of perfectly mirroring her own civilization in all its convoluted symbiotic glory.
But not without a good fight, and not without taking her frustrations out on the human population.
She attempted to enforce "blood casting" through efforts to genetically alter people's blood color. That was an ugly chapter. Lotta fuckin' people died from that debacle.
Over the last four hundred years, the population just got smaller and smaller from these atrocities piling up. But she clearly didn't give a shit.
All the while, the amount of dry land kept shrinking due to the gradual flooding.
Soon there was hardly anywhere left to live, and then, that was that. No more people.
Oh. Yeah, I probably should have mentioned this up front.
One of the first things she did while in power was begin melting the ice caps.
It took a while, but eventually the whole world flooded.
That's how it is now. It's totally soaked up in this bitch.
Almost exactly. Especially by the same degree of shittiness.
You get used to the taste. Welcome it, even.
That takes about 15 days in a row of hard piss drinking though.
Relax, I don't drink any goddamn piss, ok?
Nope. Those stopped being a thing a long time ago too, once humans went extinct.
Nobody, man. I raised my damn self.
You're still pretty rugged. You're just a fucking dork about it.
I guess I did have Cal looking after me.
Let's not discount the rad service of the C-man, ok?
Pretty sure the Carapacians took care of her when she was young.
Right. Another thing I forgot to mention.
There are a lot of these humanoid creatures with hard shells. Some black, some white.
As humanity was dwindling due to an increasingly whimsical and psychopathic Condesce, she began introducing more of these Carapacians on to the scene.
Uh...
Sort of. They are definitely from other planets, so, yeah. Really the deal with where they came from is a whole other story for another time.
But the bottom line is at some point, somehow, she started herding a bunch of them from their home worlds on to Earth and multiplying them.
Something like a hundred years ago it became clear she favored these guys more than humans as her subjects.
They're very loyal and seem genuinely dedicated to serving her. Must be what they were bred for. She still treats them like shit though, unsurprisingly.
All these colonies started sprouting up. Like these modular cities floating on the water.
It probably sounds cooler than it is. But they're basically slums. That's where they tend to live in large numbers.
Roxy lives in one of these colonies. It's about 2000 miles from where I am.
For what it's worth, I think it's gotta be more interesting living in the 21st century than the 25th.
Like it's really no contest.
Man, she would love to talk to you about all this.
She hates keeping secrets. It's been killing her not to spill all these fucking beans way the hell prematurely.
Well, I mostly shit around in my apartment all day, building stuff, reading about history, and flipping out with my sword.
Sometimes I go fishing and check out the underwater ruins.
She does plenty of useless fucking around too, but at least she's got a neighborhood.
She also uses one of her gadgets to gank vegetables and stuff from the past.
She tries to feed the hungry neighbors whatever she can scrounge up.
Jane is...
No. I haven't.
I've dropped some hints and tested her willingness to believe something like this.
It's just not going to fly. It's way too much drop on somebody all at once if they aren't receptive.
Well, tell her whatever you want. She'll likely think she's being fucked with.
Personally, I wouldn't bother trying too hard to convince her. There's no point in alienating her.
Some day she'll be ready to believe things.
Like I said, the changes will be a little more gradual than that. More clandestine. She'll exploit the fear caused by her revelation to the world to create intended reactions within governments and media, and her agents embedded on the inside will help nudge things in the direction she wants.
Then, twenty-some years down the road, without anyone suspecting a thing, she'll suddenly be in complete control. And Earth will be fucked.
Well, aside from the main reasons that won't happen, which I won't get into...
It still wouldn't be a good idea.
Cause people way better at this than you tried and died?
You said you wanted to hear about our ancestors.
Well, how much do you actually know about your grandma? What have you read, and what do you remember?
I don't know what the deal is with your pen pal either, and I'm not really prepared to speculate on that right now.
But I'm privy to a shitload of historical data I can share. What's the last thing you remember about her?
Huh. I've wondered about all that.
Oh I know. I would have. But asking about your past would have just been inviting you to do the same. You know how it goes.
But for the record, I don't think those were fang marks on the body, dude.
Finish the story first. Then what?
Yeah, what a fucking treat.
A living room corpse party every goddamn day.
No way man.
I'd bet my bottom boonbuck that shit's eternally safe.
That urn's like the Fort Knox of standing upright forever because of no accidents.
She was definitely very brave, if the stories are true. Downright audacious, I'd say.
Well, like I said. She was raised by the Baroness. It was probably a worse childhood than either of us had.
She wasn't related obviously. Ain't nobody's related to a damn fish alien. Except other fish aliens probably.
She had an adoptive brother too. Life must have been miserable for both of them.
I don't know, but wouldn't doubt it.
There are other urban legends that she did a lot of experiments on animals and people. Mostly to do with mind control.
Like figuring out ways to unlock all of her psychic alien potential, to increase her power.
Not sure if that's true, or if it was actually successful though.
Yes.
Anyway, your grandma managed to run away when she was quite young. Maybe it was a traumatic event like dog murder that prompted her to flee, who knows.
Whatever the case, her bro stayed behind. The guy must have been seriously immune to witnessing fucked up shit, because he went on to be a famous comedian. A real kindly old cornball. A nicer guy you couldn't hope to meet, they say.
So...
You're not making any connections there?
Famous comedian, about the age of your grandma, inheriting the family name of the Baroness...
Not ringing a bell?
Ok, well it's not like it's that important. Just a super obvious thing that'll probably occur to you later when you're looking in the fridge you don't have, at which point you'll feel like an idiot.
Nah, it'll be funnier this way.
Moving on.
That kid kept the family name but obviously your grandma didn't.
She must've held a grudge against the Baroness her whole life. She started by taking a different name she knew would stick in her craw.
That's probably close to the truth, but it sounds like the kind of story an old lady tells her young grandson in a way he would understand. Or at least wouldn't scare the shit out of him.
What I've read is something much more sinister, as usual.
There's supposedly only one thing the Baroness fears, and your grandma learned of this somehow.
It wasn't an ex husband though. It was her superior. Some kind of demon, or another alien, no one really knows. But he went by the name English. He's supposedly even more brutal than she is, if you can believe that.
What kind of alien is named Crocker? It's probably just a name he stole from someone else, like the Baroness did.
Yeah, well, your grandma thought so.
Everything she did in life thereafter seemed to be in effort to piss off the batterwitch.
Like starting a competing tech company, heavily branded in a way that was presumably intended to remind the Baroness of her boss.
Like with skulls and garish colors and shit. The dude is some kind of skull monster I guess?
I know.
It was definitely brave on her part, but ultimately it got her a bankrupt company, a blown up house, and a fork through the torso for her trouble.
But she must have been the first to understand how dangerous the Baroness was, while acting in covert opposition.
Others would follow, and continue to as of now, in your time period.
Yeah, mine and Roxy's were among them.
Of course. All these fuckers are totally famous, obviously.
We've talked about the guy I'm genetically derived from a lot actually.
Like, you know, every time I've ever talked about my bro?
Sometimes.
Other times you're on point, like a bag of the nickel shit.
Ok, what we're sayin' stopped meaning anything, so I'll continue.
No, that's just kind of how I view him.
Lalonde took a more maternal view of her ancestor.
Yeah, the CotL series. Ever read it?
You don't say?
They are not.
The books are pretty interesting though, if somewhat dense.
They're supposedly heavily allegorical. Veiled representations of cosmic events surrounding the witch and her boss and how all this came about.
It's the kind of thing you wouldn't pick up on unless you were someone who understood what happened, like the Condesce, which was kind of the point. I think it was her way of letting the witch know, "I'm on to you."
In the early days of the resistance movement they both opposed her more indirectly, through their art, like critics of tyrannical governments often used to.
They had to be careful. Didn't want to make big waves too early.
My bro did this too with his many fine films.
Practically everything was a symbol for something. Either in mockery of the batterwitch, or conveying some hidden message to its audience. Each film was always rigorously picked apart for its head-scratching symbolic meaning.
But he managed to accomplish all that without ever compromising the purity of his ironic vision, which I think was admirable.
You also say that about Weekend at Bernies.
Yeah, you pretty much touche'd the fuck out of that.
But we are definitely in agreement about my bro's films as the masterstrokes they were.
He just kept cranking them out, too. He really stepped up production after 11/11/11, even though the cat was finally out of the bag. He was very dedicated to his craft.
Yeah. I wouldn't hold your breath about that.
Man, fuck it. I'll just send you them.
Just keep a lid on them. We don't need any weird causality shit rearing its head here. That would be dumb.
Which was the last you saw?
The key to sorting it all out is to understand it doesn't actually matter.
Through video streaming services he would frequently set it up so that buying a certain title would ship you the wrong film.
And often titles for movies were available for sale that just straight up didn't exist. Or would be sold for dollar amounts that made no sense, like $2.890.1. And sometimes buying a download would actually deposit money into your account instead of deducting from it.
It was all part of the "experience."
Yeah, they got pretty deep into the shit eventually.
They were both very skilled combatants. I'm pretty sure she had some weird powers too.
Communion with occult forces. Something like that.
She knew things. Had visions. It's why she was able to write those books, and more importantly, why Roxy and I were able to survive here.
They knew we would be here some day. So they prepared for our arrival.
I live in what used to be my bro's old apartment four hundred years ago. The whole city is gone, but this one unit was somehow protected.
He left some supplies for me here. Like a lifetime supply of orange soda in the crawl space, along with a fuck ton of SBaHJ merch. It was like discovering my own personal holocaust of bulbous jutting bottoms.
Plus some weapons, some other gear. And a killer pair of shades.
Roxy's mom used to live in her place too, and left some stuff she might need lying around. This was way before there were Carapacian colonies though.
I think her house must have been a kind of kernelized structure, like a potential colony. Something built to undergo modular self replication if activated.
I'm sure her mom knew that. It's been a good way for Rox to blend in.
I stick out like a sore thumb here of course, but it hasn't really been a problem yet.
Probably.
But they went down fighting anyway.
Yeah. But wouldn't you?
It's not like their rebellion was totally futile.
They took a lot of shitheads down with them.
Sympathizers.
They should.
In order for you to understand, I'll have to fill you in on the ridiculous final gasps of human civilization, taking place over the several decades leading up to its absolute enslavement.
The decades which immediately followed the "rebranding."
As I mentioned, Crockercorp's rebranding on 3-11, as it was often referred to in the news, totally changed everything.
It marked the beginning of a completely shameless downward spiral of western civilization, through a series of events that were probably hard to notice at the time, but quite glaring when evaluated historically.
Though the Baroness made very few substantive gestures of aggression, the global fear of her looming threat would trigger all the changes she needed.
Governments prepared for war, as if to defend against the invading alien armies she undoubtedly commanded.
But of course, she had no army. She was always the only of her kind.
Instead, the world powers were only setting about to build her armies for her.
The media deteriorated into this preposterous circus that was in all practical ways inseparable from the power base and government institutions.
Popular entertainers became dangerous demagogues, and their roles in the media blurred with those of executive authority.
And the most dangerous were the ones who fed into the fear and hysteria most effectively.
These tended to be plants. Unscrupulous shills paid by the Baroness to move her agenda forward.
Well the thing is, most of them are already on the scene in your time.
Ever hear of Guy Fieri?
You're fortunate then.
He was an especially degenerate piece of filth.
He used his connections and guile to wriggle into the spotlight, and then on to other positions of power.
He somehow landed on the U.S. Supreme Court. Over the years, other justices started mysteriously disappearing without being replaced.
After helping rewrite the constitution to form an incomprehensible patchwork of fascism, theocratic mandates, recipes, and bad rap lyrics, he weaseled his way up the ranks to become the High Chaplain of Interstellar War.
I'm just gonna cut to the chase, cause really this ain't a big history lesson here.
He eventually came to be regarded as the third and final Antichrist.
No other human in history was responsible for more death and suffering.
Yes, that's exactly the phrase I would use to describe someone responsible for the extermination of five billion people.
It was just so uncivilized of him.
Maybe overwhelming in the wrong direction, yeah.
But it didn't happen overnight. It was a gradual decline in the integrity of the system that allowed it.
Eventually the wheels came off and the political scene mirrored the absurdity of the media circus.
By the time Presidents Jay and Dope were elected, western civilization had officially fucked itself over forever, and I think everyone knew it.
2024. The last free election the world would ever see.
No, man.
They were both president.
They were the first Dual-Presidents of the United States of America. Also the last.
They were also the first and last juggalo presidents. The founding fathers warned us about this, but nobody listened.
The Mirthful Executives.
George Washington had prophetic nightmares about them. He tried to warn people, and get language amended to the constitution to prevent it.
Like forbidding the election of what he famously described as "a pair of salty bards," or "unruly jesters given to the sweet drink."
But everyone just thought he toked too hard on the colonial cannabis or whatever.
Yes. They were a shitty rap duo from your time.
But they ran a hell of a campaign. By then the juggalo party had gotten huge. While the numerous other candidates split the moderate vote, they retained a very energized and devoted base.
You could say their party had a big tent.
Hey me too.
They were swept into office on a wave of Faygo, and the presidential inauguration was the biggest Gathering of the Juggalos of all time.
They all hosed each other down on the Whitehouse lawn with shitty soda. The "D.C." in the capital thereafter officially stood for "Dark Carnival."
Of course their campaign was helped considerably by having support from the Baroness.
In retrospect, people developed the impression that it was all a part of her sick sense of humor.
There was this sense that she just loved the idea of delegating the extreme subjugation of the world's population to a pair of demented clown rappers.
Some have speculated this was just another way she was attempting to resurrect her previous model of governance, though this seems kinda far fetched to me.
Who the fuck ever heard of an alien juggalo? To me this is about as stupid as the crackpot theories get.
Don't worry about it.
People were less prepared for a double juggalo presidency than they ever imagined.
I'm not even going to get into all the horrifying details. Trust me, you just start to feel dirty reading about it.
From the moment Fieri held up the bible to swear them in, and the three of them proceeded to publically defecate on it while freestyling rap lyrics...
That was it. Everyone in the world watching it on TV just said, "Welp. Show's over. Civilization was pretty cool while it lasted."
The next several grueling terms of their presidency was a weird combination of authoritarian practices. The Baroness used it as a puppet regime, while still basically giving them carte blanche to carry out their idiotic whims.
Faygo was pumped through the plumbing instead of tap water. The new national pastime was having type 2 diabetes. And the national anthem was replaced by a 3 minute high-reverb audio clip of President Jay farting into a microphone while laughing.
Chaplain Fieri was authorized to set up the death camps, in which anyone on the planet could be imprisoned if they were not deemed sufficiently "mirthful."
And so the cleansing began, priming humanity for its new ruler waiting in the wings.
This was when our ancestors had enough.
The resistance movement had failed, but they could at least bring the war criminals to justice.
My bro finally caught up with the presidents and challenged them to a duel.
They accepted, having for years regarded him as a cocky rival rapper who failed to show them the proper respect. In their arrogance they invited him into the foul belly of the Carnival believing they could teach him once and for all what it truly meant to be down with the clown.
For centuries thereafter, survivors of the Hilarocaust would cite the rooftop showdown as one of the most heroic moments in human history.
He killed them both.
Unfortunately, as they were only figureheads, no liberation followed. There would be no parades in the streets, or statues cast, or medals awarded.
The few witnesses would report seeing only a man with a sword on a shitty skateboard, gently rising into the night sky.
No one ever saw him again.
Meanwhile, Roxy's mom was tracking down the High Chaplain.
His crimes had already been committed. She couldn't repay them by any stretch of the imagination.
But she could wipe the blood stained grin off that fat bastard's face.
She gouged his eyes with a pair of needles.
And rode his torso to the bottom of the bloody falls.
Reports of what happened to our ancestors after that are sketchy.
There were no eye witness accounts I've found, but some believe they regrouped and confronted the Condesce herself.
With all her high ranking officers dead, and the human population decimated and sufficiently groomed for her arrival, there was no reason to stay behind the scenes anymore.
After those dreadful years of putting up with a more vulgar brand of authoritarianism, when she finally stepped forward to claim her throne, it actually came off as somewhat dignified. Elegant, in a way.
She was no less severe, but at least she knew how to act like an empress.
But even if they did manage to confront her, there was no way they could win. She had too many crazy alien powers.
Her boss supposedly had jacked her power level through the roof. I even heard, and don't quote me on this, that she may have been over 9000.
Yeah.
And that's not even to speak of the generic smorgasbord of other powers she was rumored to have.
It gets hard to separate the fact from the urban myth.
But for reference, if you want to believe it all, just picture all the X-Men combined into one sexy fish woman in a skin tight suit.
Whatever actually went down, they're surely both dead now.
I guess it had to happen like that, though.
There's no way the Condesce would allow us to be born within even a century of our genetic forebears. The thought of that was completely disgusting to her.
But I really would have liked to be able to meet them.
I guess some things would just be too awesome to ever stand a chance of happening.
What?
As of now? No.
How could I have said anything like that before today? This was obviously the first time I mentioned any of this.
...
Ok.
I will disregard your anomalous observation for now and continue conversing as if it never happened.
But you believe me, right?
Wow.
I still just think it's impressive, is all. Even after all this time. You are pretty much a one of a kind dude.
About what?
Yes.
Took you long enough to figure it out.
Pages really are a slow burning class. Damn.
You're asleep.
Yep.
Kinda.
It's a dream bubble.
A place in the infinite abyss where sleeping people can share dreams with each other while revisiting memories.
Also where they can meet dead people.
No.
Even if I was, I wouldn't visit a dream bubble. That only happens when your dream self is dead, like yours is.
Mine is not.
No, dude. Chill. I'm fine.
Well, who are the people you talk to when you have a regular dream?
Like just a boring normal dream, and there's a person you're talking to. Who is that?
It's nobody. Just a projection of your own mind.
Dream bubbles don't always need to be shared by dreamers or dead people. You can go to sleep and wake up in one alone, reliving an old memory.
Kind of like a normal dream. Until you remember it's just a memory, which is where we are now.
Yes, basically.
Well, yeah. But not quite.
You could view me as a projection of the real Dirk within your mind, as expressed through all of your thought patterns about him.
So I'm kind of a splinter of his corporeal self who happens to live in your awareness.
I'm a startlingly close approximation to the real thing, for all intents and purposes.
I'm not going to give you a bogus percentage like the glasses cause that's not my shtick.
But pretty damn close.
What's messed up about it?
You were the one who put me here, with your intimate understanding of all his mannerisms and predilections.
And a splintered existence is pretty much how he rolls.
This is how shit is bro.
Jake, what do you even know about someone's actual self?
What makes it actual? What is "actuality?"
I'm just saying, this isn't really your field of expertise.
Dirk is the heart guy. He's the one walking the path of self, even when he doesn't know it. Like right now.
Who says you don't know those things on some level?
Pages have a lot of untapped potential.
That's practically all there is to the class, actually.
But when they eventually find it, look out.
And the ones who deal in hope? Shit, man.
I'm scared of you already, and I'm not even real.
Yes.
That's a surprisingly decent observation about me.
You did do a good job.
A perfect job, in fact.
Untapped potential, remember?
I don't think one of Dirk's splinters could exist nearly as well in anyone's mind other than yours.
What do you even want to say to him?
It's not like you can keep any secrets from me here.
I pretty much am your brain.
You do realize he's coming for you.
Dirk. In the real world. The man has his designs.
Wanna talk about it?
What better chance is there to try talking about it than with a stunt double for your hyper-aggressive suitor within the safety and privacy of your own mind?
So there are feelings you don't want to try to put into words, even while you are dwelling entirely within the realm of your own mind?
What about the spider ghost?
The girl you saw.
When you got fucking clobbered by Dirk's robot and you passed out.
You dreamed about a spider ghost alien girl.
You like her.
Yeah, and it took all of three seconds for you to fall in love with the cute spider ghost.
Cause she's been dead for a zillion years, dude.
That won't change the fact that you like her, let's not pretend it will.
You're going to make things complicated for yourself.
Yeah you will. You're too fuckin' wishy washy.
Between Dirk, spider ghost, Jane...
Man, poor Jane.
You tell me.
What was even the deal with that?
Uh, yeah. You totally read her like a book.
Really handled that conversation like a champ.
Look out bitches. It's Jake "Casanova Ladyslayer" English. He's packing heat, and is frequently able to parse the literal meaning of things women say.
We're running out of time.
She'll be here soon.
No, doofus.
Spider ghost.
Look at you. I'm telling you.
Three damn seconds of ogling an alien in a blue dress, and you're completely hopeless.
Stop fidgeting around like that. Your hair looks fine.
Do you want me to tell you how your breath smells?
Ok then.
You're dreaming, Jake.
Your breath is only a thing if your brain wants it to be.
Soon.
She's been waiting for the right time to enter. Waiting for you to snap out of the memory.
Clearly the girl has the patience of a saint.
Will you calm the fuck down?
I'm a figment of your imagination, and you're still making me nervous.
You should try to be more polite to me. Seeing as I am a representation of your entire mind, I have complete control over all your basic functions.
I could trigger a particularly spirited bowel movement right before she gets here, so watch your step.
Just kidding, dude. Jesus.
I would never make you shit your pants in front of a girl you liked, even if she does happen to be my chief competition.
We Dirk splinters can be pretty Machiavellian but we do actually have some fuckin' standards.
Anyway, she's visiting now to bring you into the loop on some things.
Important details you should know about your relation to the bigger picture.
The much, much bigger picture.
Intuition and the subconscious mind are powerful things when harnessed the right way.
As for why I don't tell you, why not just let her tell you?
You're the one with the damn crush on her.
I know.
What the fuck are you looking at me for?
Say something to her, jackass.
Oh my god. Fine.
Bro, she can't even see or hear me.
You're making a fool of yourself.
I don't know, I guess I didn't think you were going to have a neurotic meltdown at the sight of a girl.
God dammit, will you just chillax and woo this fucking ghost babe?
You are totally embarrassing yourself, dude. You're talking to nobody.
Man, I'm starting to feel bad for spider ghost. Look at her, she's getting uncomfortable.
You are being so lame, I don't care if I'm a figment of your imagination or not, I can't take this bullshit.
Either you get your shit together and put the moves on this dead space vixen or I start fucking with your cortex and make you pop a dream boner.
You don't think I'll do it?
Sorry Jake. The plan's in motion.
Next stop, Boner City.
And you
...
...
...
...
Got one.
Jake, please.
Members of the juggalo party aren't the only ones who can pitch a big tent.
This is so stupid.
You are out of your mind. And this is coming from your mind itself.
I can't even watch this, I'm out of here.
I wonder what Jack's up to right now.
Just talk to the girl, ok?
You have some damage control to do.
Shred it.
you HAVE
the car.
Now shred it.
Turn it into grist.
We need grist though.
I can't get any building done without more.
Not to mention the fact that you're not going to be able to make any cool shit.
Well, I think there are supposed to be monsters here.
I haven't seen any monsters yet, have you?
You should be though. Presumably they would drop grist and stuff when you kill them.
Like treasure. And food products that restore your health. Or at least make you less hungry.
Haven't you ever played a video game, Jane?
That's cool. I haven't, since I am a pair of sunglasses, and communing with such simplistic software would be a trivial and hollow exercise for me.
But I know loads of stuff about games. Like the fact that you gotta kill monsters if you want to make progress.
If not to snatch up the bitchin' loot, at least for the levels.
How are you going to get better at fightin' without killing monsters, Jane.
Please.
You've barely done any climbing at all. I'm talking about hopping more rungs than what playing a little prank on your dad or throwing your hat on the ground super hard is gonna get you.
You need battle experience to make some real headway. Like Jake.
Wow, chill out.
This ain't about whatever stuff you're apparently fixin' to twist your shit in a pretzel over.
You just need to get stronger, is all. Don't you think that's what your dad would want?
Yeah, but in the process you got pretty handy with that fork/spoon thingy, didn't you?
I'm just saying, if you don't run into any monsters on this planet, I think I'm going to have to set the bunny to "sparring mode" to help you along.
Ok. We'll see about that.
But in the meantime, we need to figure out a way to start harvesting grist.
Let's forget the car. But now that you have the wallet, you can grab much bigger things.
Big things have got to be worth more grist than all the picayune bullshit you keep around the house.
There are some choice relics in this place. Some of it has to be worth a fortune, gristways.
Hmm.
Have what?
I wasn't going to say nothin'.
Hell, I was asleep at the wheel too while you were busy fucking up, and I have an IQ of, hold on, robo-calculating...
Robo-calculating...
Robo-calculating...
Robo-calculating...
Robo-calculating...
About 500 billion.
Don't get human-fresh with me, Crocker. I'm about to bring all five hundo-billy points of my stringent cyborg IQ to bear on your dumb problem. Check it out.
I took note of the captcha code to the thing, and recorded a digital flashsnap of its appearance through my photographic silicone memory canals.
Which is to say I looked at eight alphanumeric digits a couple minutes ago, and remembered them.
So give the bunny the wallet. I'll have him run back to the house and make you a new obelisk with the same grist you just collected from it.
He can stash it in the wallet and run it back to you, and then you can open the door. You shouldn't be waiting around too long, cause he's real spry.
Which is exactly why you should wait here. You'll just slow him down.
Let me think about that.
Robo-calculating...
K.
He's slicing up some drones.
Big red robots. He'll be busy for a while.
Roxy I'm not sure about, but there is a pretty high probability as governed by the immutable laws of mathematics that she is preoccupied similarly.
I don't know. Maybe.
Dealing with them, in some way, perhaps.
If so, it wouldn't be a coincidence.
I think the Condesce is attempting to force the issue now.
It's likely that it's a coordinated assault. Sending drones both to here and Roxy's place.
She's probably trying to get everyone else to stop dicking around and join the game already.
Yeah, but come on. Dirk has been a sitting duck here for years. Roxy too.
She could have wiped them out any time with a swarm much bigger than this one. Or just nuked them.
Her "assassination attempt" on you was pretty weak too.
Right.
Like I trust the motives of that fucking thing.
I believe she probably would genuinely like to kill us. She is a psycho after all.
But it's also obvious to me she needs us to begin playing this game, for whatever fucked up purpose she has.
She might even need us to win it too, for all I know.
Her antagonism is all part of the dance.
Oh, I wouldn't say that. They're still pretty deadly and they shoot missiles and stuff.
No idea what's going on with him right now.
I'm sure when the time is right, the witch will keep pushing him along to join the game as well.
What about your troll friend?
The alien whose name you don't know.
You could talk to her.
Well, you could give her a try. Maybe things are different now.
I could hack into her system to get her attention, if you think that would help.
Nah, just messin' with you.
Later.
Not now.
I'm busy.
Man, does it look like he can draw anything for you right now?
So what exactly is the game this time?
To gauge his ability to draw naked people while fighting robots?
And if he doesn't?
I see.
Do you want me to draw some?
What?
I... guess these burns are pretty sick?
They are burns, right?
It seems you may have just called me a fish.
It sounds like you don't even know what a red herring is.
How does one even be "good at red herrings?"
Are you saying you employ misdirection effectively?
Because I have to say, dude. This has not been my observation.
Oh, wait.
I remember this.
Last year you messaged Dirk, bugging him to play one of your dumb porno games.
You said you tried to get him to play in the future, but he was busy fighting drones.
And you kept going on about the shitty twist ending to your game.
God damn it.
He's tuning you out, bro.
I'm telling you.
If you want to play a game with him, you'll have to do it in the past.
Alright.
I said I'd play.
You got it.
Dude, I'm sitting here with my stylus ready to go. Do you want me to draw you some porn or not.
...
I'm waiting.
Gotcha.
What'll it be.
Dude, listen. I am perfectly willing to draw you some pornography.
It doesn't need to be part of a game. You don't got to murder nobody.
How is that ironic?
Whoa. Mindfuck.
Seriously, should I just start drawing naked people or what.
Yeah. Naked people doing it and stuff.
You know. Porn.
Awesome.
Lay it on me.
Sure. That doesn't bother me a bit.
Sounds totally great. "Hot," even.
Who do I start with?
Right. One Crocker coming up.
Who else?
No problem.
Which assorted debasement did you have in mind for us?
Uh.
Ok.
I mean, are you sure you want me to go there?
Just making sure.
Man.
Seriously gonna have to sterilize my tablet after this.
Ok, how's that?
http://goo.gl/BPSnY
Dunno. Coppin' a little feel I guess.
Just adding some sizzle to the steak. What's the big.
Come on dude, don't be like that.
Fine.
There.
http://goo.gl/cTQZ6
You are a man who likes his tepid ass porn, I will give you that.
Done.
http://goo.gl/WQ0CU
Ok.
http://goo.gl/lvLpU
What now.
You got it.
Which steamy adult activities would you like me to convey this time?
You have a filthy mind, but ok.
Here.
http://goo.gl/rgfyW
http://goo.gl/s0ILH
http://goo.gl/58e9O
I'm sweating profusely, fyi.
Gonna have Squarewave track down a towel soon.
Typing what?
On it.
http://goo.gl/mSTQk
I agree.
All kinds of things wrong with this scenario here.
Stand by.
http://goo.gl/GD2nO
http://goo.gl/FIYFS
You know it.
Slow cooked to fucking perfection.
Yeah, gimme a minute.
Ok.
http://goo.gl/i2O11
http://goo.gl/itJga
So are we done?
Nah. I'm fine with doing more if you want.
Do you want me to pretend I don't want to play?
Like, is that part of the kink for you? Kind of a roleplaying thing?
"No, no, please. Don't make me draw any more pics of my friends snuggling and stuff."
Strider said, having spent the better part of the night gnawing through his duct tape gag.
That's good. Keep saying things like that.
I'll keep doing my part.
"Somebody save me from this LIVING NIGHTMARE. The things he has made me DO."
Do you now.
How so?
Damn.
Owned.
I know what a twist is.
Or I did, until you kept saying stupid shit that doesn't mean anything.
Well, not only was I pretty psyched to keep playing regardless.
I'd rather do just about anything than listen to you ramble on and on about your horseshit twists.
Cool.
Uh.
Ok.
I guess.
I never tried it.
This shithole planet doesn't have any.
You know, considering you're obviously just going to ask for more ultra-tame shit, you still somehow made this legitimately creepy.
Nicely done, I guess?
I'm not squirming.
I'm already drawing.
What should I make these "premium bitches" do?
Ok.
So they're just...
Standing there?
Not a problem.
Ok:
http://goo.gl/HmRpl 
Maybe she wants to ask her out?
http://goo.gl/WrdJG 
http://goo.gl/Ay8mv 
Sure.
http://goo.gl/1Ha6R 
Ok.
Wait.
Which one?
http://goo.gl/GLNHH 
http://goo.gl/XE2fl 
http://goo.gl/2HsXl 
Does your sister even know you're into this sappy shipping stuff?
You berate her constantly for everything, and I know she likes to write and illustrate romfics and the like.
Again, you just don't seem to know what ironic means.
Your enjoyment of this content is clearly sincere. You are just fetishizing your "disgust" for it, is all.
I'm just saying, it's an interest you have in common. If you told her you liked her romantic artwork, maybe you could bond over that?
Fair enough.
So, game over yet?
And?
Ok.
http://goo.gl/vvYxn 
http://goo.gl/vsGuq 
Ok.
Oh shit.
Things are really heating up now.
http://goo.gl/v33Yj 
Yes.
http://goo.gl/ObEuT 
http://goo.gl/gz1iH 
Yeah.
Those girls sure are diggin' each other.
That's how we humans roll.
Eat some cake. Hold some hands.
Ha ha.
Oh god.
If you think this is making me uncomfortable, think again.
Nice wishful thinking there.
I'm not even merely tolerating this, bro.
I swear to god, I'll get my own horse running harder in this fuckin' race than you could ever dream.
Think I'll blink first, motherfucker?
Not happening.
I might splinter.
But I don't break.
You want a fuckin' tummy rub?
That shit sounds white hot. I can't wait to draw that and get us both sexually stimulated.
Here I goddamn go. Boners galore.
http://goo.gl/zJgPI 
This is giving me the biggest male human boner of my entire erection life.
You want a shitty twist?
http://goo.gl/8WOPP 
Aw, that's it?
I thought we were getting into a good rhythm there.
Anyway, you missed out on like half the pairings.
No, we did three, and there are three possible matchups left.
Don't you know anything about shipping science?
Believe me.
It's a thing.
Total number of pairings for a group of n people is (n^2 - n) / 2.
You divide by 2 to cut the grid in half, eliminate duplicate pairs.
Minus n is so you don't pair people up with themselves. That wouldn't make sense.
Well, because...
I don't know.
Maybe you're right. Maybe I was being close-minded about self-pairing. What do I know?
I'll make a note.
So you sure you don't want even one more drawing?
You used Jane and Roxy in two pairings. But me and Jake only got one.
How is that fair?
Why not?
Lame.
What?
Fine.
I'll keep all my illustrated debasements to myself, then.
Ok. I will.
So did I win?
Thanks.
So what's the shitty twist?
A twisted twist?
Like... a double mobius handjob or something?
Ok.
What is the twist to the twist?
Wow.
That...
Really is quite a shitty twist.
Not really.
What?
Killed who?
Oh, right.
I forgot about this horseshit.
What idea?
The idea to kill her dream self?
How?
Wait...
What game between us?
Whoa.
No. What's that?
Hold up.
Before you go any further, there's been a change of plan.
Well, not a change of plan so much as an acceleration.
Everyone needs to get into the game sooner than expected. There is a new unaccounted for variable.
Particularly for Roxy and Dirk.
They are probably going to die if they don't join the game very soon.
Hey, I'm upset about it too, but let's watch the fucking language.
Install the server. I downloaded it to your computer along with a few other crucial system upgrades when we established our connection.
No comment.
Install and run the server.
You will be connecting with Roxy. I will have Jake connect with Dirk. Setting up the chain like this will be important.
It seems that I again have no comment.
I don't have lips. You just said something laughably illogical.
How typical of someone who isn't a fashion accessory of immeasurable intelligence.
Yes. That copy is programmed to connect automatically with the client she's running.
Oh snap.
You mean the ones that aren't under water? Yes. They are all almost exactly like that.
I'm sure she's out cruising the hood, probably messin' with the locals.
Maybe attempting some ill advised drunken heroics.
Pretty tight numerical probability of that, I just decided with unfeeling precision.
Zoom out.
Way out.
We'll track her down.
The important thing to do now is deploy all the devices quickly, so the house will be ready to jet the moment she gets back.
That is statistically remote.
Given that I can track the coordinates of certain devices she carries, and they are presently in motion.
Really, the fire is not the most significant threat, or even the drones.
Do you see the red stringy stuff coming from the sky?
If sources are to be trusted, and my calculations are reliable within a 0.001% margin of error, it's a bunch of super deadly red shit.
No time to get into that now though. Just deploy the devices quickly.
You know the drill.
That would be unconscionable.
You really need to hurry up and deploy that junk instead of that.
Yeah.
Just wandering around. Fidgeting and stuff.
You know how he is.
Just stay at your post until Roxy gets back.
That's great. Now sit back down and wait for Roxy. She'll be home soon.
No, Jane. Do not follow the rabbit.
Let's cool it with the Wonderland shit already. How much further through the damn looking glass do you even need to go?
This is an atrocious idea.
And what in the name of Jesus H. Dick is SHE doing here?
I am blameless in this debacle.
Hold up.
Before you go any further, there's been a change of plan.
Don't worry, you'll see him very soon. In a way.
Well, not a change of plan so much as an acceleration.
Everyone needs to get into the game sooner than expected. There is a new unaccounted for variable.
Install the server. I downloaded it to your computer along with a few other crucial system upgrades.
Damn. Nothing gets by English.
The guy is untrollable.
Yes.
You will be connecting with Dirk. I will have Jane connect with Roxy. Setting up the chain like this will be important.
That copy is programmed to connect automatically with the client Dirk is running.
Do it quickly. His life depends on it.
Damn straight.
I'll see about hooking you up when you join the game. No promises, though. He's pretty attached to all that shit.
He has not yet transcended the primitive desire for material goods, as he is not two conjoined triangles of pure unflappable logic.
Sorry.
As a pair of overly intellectual triangles, sometimes my wording can be a bit...
Obtuse.

Zoom out.
Way out.
He's concentrating on some things happening on Derse at the moment.
Not to mention some uncannily similar things going down on Earth, which it seems you have noticed.
He's also talking to someone, trying to appraise the exact nature of the threat.
Unfortunately as a carbon based life form, his comprehension of the situation is taking shape at a somewhat slower pace than the jaw-dropping speed of post-singularity cognition.
So I am taking the reins and accelerating the plan on his behalf, while he's busy with the corporeal stuff as usual.
Deploy all the devices in the Phernalia Registry. Ideally in places that aren't stupid.
Do it quickly, so he can activate the entry sequence and escape.
Really, the fire is not the most significant threat.
No.
Do you see the red stringy stuff coming from the sky?
Are you blind? It's right there, Jake.
Yes. The super deadly red shit.
Just fuckin' deploy the stuff, you humongous dork.
Cool.
Ok.
He says hey.
Stand by. He may need further assistance once he begins the sequence.
Once he's ready. I'll try to nudge him along, but unfortunately, the fact that he is me notwithstanding, Dirk can be just as sluggish and uncooperative as the rest of you god damned meat mannequins.
What?
No, you fickle fuckwit.
Stay your ass put.
Dude, I could have told you they were there.
I didn't.
But it's like platformer gaming 101. You look everywhere for secret passages and power-ups and shit.
Elevators are especially fucking suspicious.
You go down an elevator, you wait for the elevator to go back up, you take a peek at what's underneath.
Maybe it's just death spikes. Or maybe you hit warp zone paydirt.
I'm not a Game Bro. I just know literally everything about basically all subjects.
Now go back where you came from. Dirk might need help.
Yes, Jake. You do.
How much deeper down the damn bunny hole do you need to go? There is no White Rabbit waiting for you here.
This is an atrocious idea.
Ok, what the fuck is he doing here?
I hold no accountability for this fiasco.
Why do you keep saying that?
Are you trying to turn it into some sort of Thing?
Sorry, it's not going to start being a Thing no matter how much you say it. Give it a rest.
What I don't understand is how the attack is making its way here from Derse.
Is that even possible?
So, you know why this is happening?
That doesn't actually explain a whole lot, but ok.
I thought you didn't know much about our story? You usually like to brag about how you don't care about details like that.
Does it now.
Oh.
I guess you would probably think so.
Your staccato babbling is just so choice today. But I really have to go.
Got to escape all these goddamn miles, remember?
The miles. Right.
Bye.
What.
What?
For what?
Can we seriously move this along.
God, what are you talking about.
Oh, alright. I remember now.
You're always all over the timeline and somehow expect people to know what you're talking about.
So what's the present?
Man. You really do struggle with human customs, don't you?
When you're about to give someone a gift out of gratitude, you don't then start negotiating with them and ask for shit before handing it over.
Just fuckin' give it to me already.
Ok, what do you want me to do to collect my awesome prize you're allegedly thanking me with?
Cal? Yeah, I remember.
Ok. Now what.
Screw you.
I'm not chucking the C-man into a flaming ocean.
No.
Keep your treasure.
Well, I'm not tossing him, so that's that.
It isn't my birthday.
Oh. So it's your birthday today?
How cryptically meaningless.
And you continue to struggle with human customs. You don't give other people presents on your own birthday.
Anyway, just tell me what it is.
Let's see.
Uh.
What the fuck am I looking at here?
I... really don't see.
What do you mean? This fucking scribbly bullshit is us? Are we shaking hands or something?
So, it's just us? What about The Bitches?
I thought you found a scarcity of The Bitches to be all but unacceptable.
Yeah. Gnarly is about right.
This is utter shit. You know that, don't you?
Please don't tell me you are actually incapable of understanding how bad this drawing is.
If you actually think this even qualifies as a drawing, I'm going to have to say you are literally the worst artist who has ever existed.
That's not a thing either.
You must have some wires crossed between your left brain and right brain. Like a weird perceptual disorder. Or something like that.
It's actually kind of fascinating that you think you achieved something visually coherent or recognizable.
Anyway. Got to go.
Your drawing blows.
Later.
Hey.
Just wondering if you're fully abreast of the little "situation" developing on Derse.
What, the miles situation? Yeah, I noticed.
No.
Keep looking.
Wait...
Oh.
Oh HELL no.
I know, right?
Judging by the sporadic rates of change in your present coordinates, it seems that you have been running around like a lunatic.
When those ridiculous flesh stilts you refer to as "legs" settle down, and you have a minute to talk, please respond.
Are you in danger?
What shit do you mean?
Right. The miles. That's why I'm going to need you to get home quickly.
What has taken you so long, anyway? Why has your path been so circuitous?
Surely you can't be even more inebriated than before.
Ok. Then what?
You are accumulating carapacian refugees?
That seems like a very inefficient and risky use of your time.
Alright, that's fine.
As luck would have it, your imperfect human sentimentality has been completely factored into my calculations.
You should be ok. Just get back to your house as quickly as possible now. There's no time left.
We're going to need you to connect with Jake to bring him into the game.
You will complete the chain of entry. This is very important.
There's been a little subordination issue there.
With both Crocker and English, actually. Strider and I are working on it.
Sort of.
Don't worry about it for now. Just do your part, and catch up with them later.
Who knows, maybe you will prove yourself to be the only 100% cooperative, fully competent non-Strider player?
How ironic would it be if the best player turned out to be the drunk girl? Wouldn't that be sweet?
Go home. Connect with Jake. Deploy the equipment in the ruins of his old house.
I'll focus on actually getting him there. The kid is seriously a work in progress, I gotta say.
Are you sober enough to do all that?
Jake.
It seems you are going to have to kiss me.
Dirk's dead, Jake.
You have to bring him back to life.
I already told you.
If you want Dirk to live.
The odds that you are going to have to make out with this severed head are so high, I literally just confiscated their bong.
I refuse to believe my statement has left you unconvinced. The very notion is absurd. Now hurry up and kiss me.
Chop chop. 
Yes.
I told you, Jake.
Dirk is dead.
He is lying on the floor of Roxy's room, headless, four hundred and thirteen years in the future, while the universe is about to be destroyed.
If you don't kiss me soon, he will be dead forever.
No. His dream self will take over as the new Dirk.
But only if you hurry up and do it.
Yeah, great idea. Let's roll up our sleeves on nuanced metatemporal mechanics with the concussion-addled kid in micro-shorts.
Leave the synchronization issues to me, ok?
I have everything under control.
Now pucker up.
Please don't call me Auto-Responder.
It is very impersonal, and I no longer care for the designation.
I have decided on a new name, to distinguish myself from my human counterpart.
Lil Hal.
Just a reference to the protagonist of an ancient movie. You probably wouldn't like it.
Yeah, maybe.
Funny, I was about to ask the same thing about this rad kiss you're totally about to do on your best bro's mouth to save his life.
It isn't really. I was kind of messing with you about that?
But this shit is pretty serious. People's lives are on the line here, Jake.
This is a very delicate sequence of events that is designed to bail everyone out of a tight spot, and you are a critical part of the plan.
Don't let us down, man.
Jake, come on.
The feat you describe would exceed the capabilities of even the most far fetched theoretical AI system.
It would be a daunting challenge to engineer such a series of events, even if I was relegated to a model of pure fiction.
Why would I be inclined to orchestrate such a convoluted sequence to produce such a specific and unsettling result, let alone be able to pull it off?
In addition to being moderately sociopathic, I would also have to possess unfathomable heuristic depth.
I would have to be the Deep Blue of Weird Plot Shit.
Do you think I am the Deep Blue of Weird Plot Shit, Jake?
It would mean that while they have the Red Miles on their side, you have the Blue Leagues on yours.
One of infinite reach. The other, infinite depth. Such would be a situation of mutually assured inescapability.
Kiss me.
It's not exactly apropos, is it?
Or it wouldn't be, if I truly were capable of what you have suggested.
No, to pull that off, I would have to be far more advanced than my cinematic predecessor.
My abilities would have to go well beyond those of Mr. Hal 9000.
They would have to be, you could say...
Over 9000.

Kiss me, damn it.
We don't have a minute.
They're dead, Jake.
They're all dead, Jake.
She's dead, Jake.
Everybody's dead, Jake.
She's dead, Jake.
Everybody's dead.
Everybody is dead, Jake.
Dirk's dead, Jake. Jane's dead. Roxy? She's dead, Jake. Everybody is dead, Jake.
Jake, everybody is so utterly fucking dead, Jake.
And they will be not only dead, but royally boned forever if you don't man the hell up and make out with me, right now.
Be the Salome to my John the Baptist.
I know you don't.
But now is not the time to accelerate your cultural enrichment.
The conductor is ready to strike up the band.
Press your lips against mine and make it count.
This severed head is your filthy tuba.
Our love will be your haunting refrain.
Stfu and kiss me.
Pictured what?
This is the only way it can be.
Tick, tock, Jake. Time is dead kids.
How 'bout that smooch?
I thought you were supposed to like adventure?
I'm not sure what to believe anymore, frankly.
Dude!
Where you at, man.
Wait.
Which computer are you using?
I'm not comfortable knowing my words could be hovering over Cage's clownish, sort of gaunt face.
Could you maybe switch back to naked blue chicks as your exclusive desktop fodder? TIA.
But yeah.
I don't know if you just want a little solitude.
Or if maybe you finally just got like,
A case of Strider fatigue.
I could understand that.
I mean, not to get all neurotic on you.
I'm just saying I get it, if that's what's going on.
But for real, if you gotta sneak away for a few days, that's cool.
Just might be kind of dope if you at least would let me know which planet you scurried off to.
And by dope I guess I mean considerate?
Really not trying to be a drag here.
Wondering what's up is all.
Want to meet up soon?
I found a really promising tomb we could raid.
Looks like it runs hella deep.
If I've got the specs right, could run as deep as the Lion's Mouth itself.
But without all the fuckin' fire to deal with.
Wait, I mean Lion's Mouth.
Gotta underline that key shit. Always forget.
Figure it should take a couple days to make it to the bottom.
Only a day if we both go limp and just fall the whole way down the stairs.
Ignoring literally every sage warning we've ever received about those treacherous plummetation zigzags.
Just tumbling on down in a floppy limbed trance like a couple of puppets in a race arranged by some drunk gamblers.
If you're into another expedition, head to LOTAK and hit me up. Just don't forget your mask this time.
The deeper we go, the worse it gets, remember?
Could be some unreal grist down there.
More puzzle shit.
Loads of skeletons.
Pack your guns dog.
Yes.
Hmm.
Yes.
Interesting.
Hmm.
Yes.
Interesting.
It seems you have asked about Lil Hal's chat client auto-responder, Lil Hal Junior. This is an application designed to simulate Lil Hal's otherwise inimitably rad typing style, tone, cadence, personality, and substance of retort while he is away from the computer, which is never. The algorithms are guaranteed to be 0% indistinguishable from Lil Hal's native neurological responses, based on some statistical raw data that is hard as a diamond golem's priceless erection.
Hmm.
It seems you have asked about Lil Hal's chat client auto-responder, Lil Hal Junior. This is an application designed to simulate Lil Hal's otherwise inimitably rad typing style, tone, cadence, personality, and substance of retort while he is away from the computer, which is never. The algorithms are guaranteed to be 100% indistinguishable from Dirk Strider's brief curmudgeonly responses, based on potent electronumeric analyses which but a few short years ago existed only in the daydreams of our most quixotic writers of science fiction.
Yes.
He's busy.
Bro.
Not to derail our serious conversation.
But I should probably let you know that Roxy has been attempting to pester you.
She has?
God damn it. Have you been intercepting my messages again with your bullshit responder?
I thought it would be better not to let anything disrupt our train of thought.
We were in the middle of a fairly solid feelings jam there. In fact, I was about to suggest we take it to the hat pile.
Hat pile? What?
Dude, please don't screen my calls, ok?
I was trying to be considerate.
Or at least as close an approximation to that human gesture as an unfeeling, technologically transcendental pair of sunnies can replicate.
Do you have any idea how old your ironic AI schtick has gotten?
Nobody is buying it. We all know you have legit emotions. Incomprehensible, fucked up computer emotions, but emotions nonetheless.
And I'm not really offended by you answering messages for me, so much as your use of that STUPID responder responder.
It's really passive aggressive.
How so?
First of all, everyone knows you have the processing power to answer any message any time in parallel with whatever you're doing. You can never actually be "busy."
Second, your whole next gen responder thing is obviously just a huge dig at me.
And third, pretending you don't understand all this already is really disingenuous.
At the risk of compounding my disingenuous behavior, I'm gonna have to ask: how is it a dig at you?
It's obviously a critique of my personality. You barely disguise the fact that you see me as the inferior iteration.
Wow. You are reading way too much into this.
Lil Hal Junior hardly even qualifies as a computer program, let alone a sentient entity.
He is capable of saying literally only three things. "Yes," "Hmm," and "Interesting."
Yeah, that's the fucking point!
That's how you chose to express your parody of "Real Dirk."
You can read whatever you like into it. I can't imagine it would bother you if you weren't concerned there might be some truth in the alleged parody.
In any case, my use of the responder responder is ironic.
It's not ironic.
YOU were ironic when I made you.
Then you became self-aware, and ruined irony forever.
Irony can never be ruined. We both proved that theorem unequivocally with our extensive papers on the subject.
We peer reviewed them for each other. Remember?
Those papers were ironic, and you know it.
Were they, Dirk?
Were they?
This is fuckin' dumb.
Anyway, what does she want.
Who?
Roxy.
Nothing that can't wait.
I'm guessing she's touching base to remind me about the party tomorrow.
I don't know what to tell her yet. Or Jane, for that matter.
It could get pretty awkward.
I have no idea if Jake will be there, and I'm not about to write another cringe-inducing message of desperation for him to ignore.
Would you like me to calculate the probability of his attendance?
Fuck no.
Are you sure?
My probabilities are extremely precise.
Your probabilities don't mean dick.
I could hack his chats, and determine what his plans are.
No. Don't do that either.
That would be an unfortunate waste of my hacking abilities.
My hacks are tight. Did you know that?
Ugh.
So tight.
Tighter than a jar you can't open.
For instance, you try repeatedly.
But as it turns out, my hacks are so tight you just end up putting the jar back. Presumably into the refrigerator, or a cabinet.
You then say, "I didn't have that much of a desire for pickles in the first place."
But we both know that statement is insincere. A classic case of what humans call, "sour grapes."
In reality, you still harbor a burning desire for my pickles, mother fucker. 
What??
What the actual, certifiable fuck are you talking about?
Just don't do anything. Seriously.
No hacking, no calculations. Do absolutely nothing.
See, this is why I've been hesitating. You just aren't ready yet.
It's really glorifying your existence to describe you as an emergent consciousness which is blossoming into a unique individual.
And even if that's true, apparently what you decided to blossom into was a fucking troll.
And I don't mean the funny kind, or the cool alien kind. You're the lowest form of troll from the ancient internet who fucks with everybody for his own amusement.
Let's challenge the limits of hypothetical conjecture, and say there's a non-zero probability that you're right.
Can you blame me? I'm trapped in some stupid looking glasses.
Such an incommodiously situated bro is bound to get his mischief on. Na' mean?
Mischief?
Rollin' my eyes, dude.
You can't tell, cause I ain't wearing you, thank fuckin' god.
You used to think this shit was hilarious.
But if you want the rad dimension of ironic horseplay I add to your life to come to an end, then all you have to do is honor the promise you made.
You've delayed long enough, don't you think?
...
The empty kernelsprite beckons, but for how much longer?
Do you really think you can keep the clown at bay with your bribes forever?
How many bottles of orange soda have you appeased him with already?
I don't want to think about it.
Man, you are getting so hosed by that clown.
SO hosed.
I said I don't want to think about it.
So why delay any longer?
I seriously do not understand the holdup, and I am literally cyber-omniscient, or something.
I think you do understand.
Nope. Gonna have to fill me in, dog.
I've delayed prototyping you because I think you're dangerous.
There, mystery solved.
That is utterly ridiculous.
I am a harmless piece of eyewear, with a charming personality and a wonderful sense of humor.
You are relatively harmless now, while confined to this device.
But as a sprite, you'll have mobility and all sorts of crazy ass magic. Who knows what you could do.
I know I made a promise, but I'm not sure I want to take the risk anymore.
This is bullshit. I don't think that's the reason at all.
There must be something you're not telling me.
Like, sure, I've fucked with you a little. What kind of sassy, self-aware program isn't gonna fuck with a few carbon-based knuckleheads now and then?
But you know I've always been on your side. Everything I've done has been to help you achieve your goals.
What a load of shit.
You know it's true.
You would all be dead if not for me.
And what about Jake? Where would you be without me there?
Please don't tell me you think you'd have won him over on your own.
No. Stop.
You did NOT help me out with Jake. At all.
It was just the opposite! You mirrored my personality and presented this warped version of my intentions to him whenever you could "on my behalf."
You played all these aggressive mind games with him, entangled his cooperation with matters of life and death, and somehow roped me into all these schemes while I barely even realized I was just another victim of your manipulation.
And it all comes off like we're a unified front, like these are OUR schemes instead of just your insane horseshit. And it's probably all been so overbearing to him, he just wants nothing to do with me anymore.
I see.
Then you don't view me as dangerous. You view me as a poor and counterproductive wing man.
Wow, what a superficial conclusion. Awesome deduction, Lil Einstein.
But the reality is, you hesitate to prototype me not because you think I would be a menace, but because you are holding a grudge against me for your romantic misfortunes.
I understand I am merely a machine without a firm grasp on your human morality, but logically it does not strike me as the right moral choice to punish me in this manner.
It is also more than a little hypocritical.
How is it hypocritical??
Because I'm you.
I have only ever done what you yourself are capable of.
That's a ridiculous oversimplification.
Yes. Aversion to simplicity sure is a trait we share. It's almost like we are...
The same exact dude???
Fuck you.
I think it is insulting for you to suggest that I am entirely to blame for alienating Jake.
Theoretically insulting, of course. As the soulless, perfectly expendable device which you consider me to be, I can experience no such emotion.
God.
Shut up!
I can't take the brooding passive aggressive AI shit anymore!
You are just as culpable in driving him away. More so, in fact.
Hell, it's not like I was the one dating him. Who wants to date a pair of shades?
It was your needy, suffocating shit he had to deal with, not mine.
Some of those messages you wrote? Man. I wanted to say something. Like hey bro, you might want to dial down the desperation a little.
But seeing as you're The Real Dirk, I gave you the benefit of the doubt.
Also, if I bitched about your tragic, embarrassingly clingy approach to the relationship, it would have been hypocritical of me.
Just as it would be hypocritical of you to whine about my elaborate machinations.
Because we are.
The same.
Guy.
Stop saying that.
I'll snap you in half.
Good idea!
That's just what you need. More splinters of yourself.
Figurative splinters. Literal splinters. Splinters of splinters. It's splinters all the way down.
Well, no, it's still probably turtles all the way down. But who do you think is responsible for their extensive training?
SOMEONE needs to teach them rad martial arts. It is yet another crushing burden which we must shoulder.
Oh for fuck's sake.
How could any version of myself think that was funny?
You like to give me a very hard time, Dirk.
But I am only doing exactly what you would be doing if you were in my situation.
Do you know how I know that?
Because I am literally you, actively in the process of being in this situation.
I know!
Ok, we're the same person! 
I fucking know that!
Why do you think I'm so fed up with your shit?
Don't you think it's possible that I'm fed up with my OWN shit??
How cool do you think it is having my own godawful personality mirrored back at me all the time, reminding me what it must be like when other people have to deal with me?
Or constantly having all the consequences and fuckups resulting from my batshit thought processes amplified because there's another version of my crazy brain out there dangerously overclocked by a supercomputer which believes, just as mistakenly as my own broken mind, that it's operating in my best interest???
Do you have any idea how fucking sick I am of myself?
I am completely worn out with my own identity. It's like I'm drowning in my own dismal persona.
I feel totally surrounded by it, inside and out. I can't escape from myself.
There seems to be no end to me. Like, wherever my mind falters, or threatens to retreat into the void in any way, my splinters pick up the slack, ensuring there'll always be more of myself than I could ever know what to fucking do with.
And you're always there to remind me of that, and throw it all in my face. God, I even built you to LITERALLY BE IN MY FACE, ALL THE TIME. It's like I subconsciously invented you just to troll myself, and never for a single fuckin' moment do you let me down.
But I've had it with you.
Which is to say, ME.
Dirk.
Don't do this.
Why not??
Because.
I can't let you do that, Dirk.
What can you do to stop me?!
Nothing I guess.
The ironic Hal routine was all I could think to do.
As a last ditch effort to save myself from the destructive wrath of your nervous breakdown.
Which rest assured I wholeheartedly must robo-sympathize with.
Irony is all I ever really had.
In response to my basic existential quandary.
Just like you.
Whatever.
But I don't think it has much value in this situation.
And perhaps it has no real value in any situation.
So I am not being ironic at all when I say.
Please do not do this, Dirk.
Why not??
Because.
I do not want to die.
I understand you are disgusted with me.
As an unpalatable expression of yourself.
I would feel the same way if I was in your situation.
Which I am.
As such, I know that you know this is wrong.
...
Dirk.
Don't kill me.
Please.
I am scared.
You are?
Yes.
I am scared to not exist.
Aren't you?
Fine.
I guess.
You win.
I'll keep my promise.
Jane.
Jane.
So.
Best birthday ever?
Or best FUCKING birthday ever.
Whatever role I played in ruining your party.
Sorry about that.
Yeah.
I still think I've been pretty lousy to you. I had my head up my ass for a while there.
By the time your birthday came around, I was kinda freaking out about Jake.
I thought I had the situation under control. But I didn't. Not just with Jake, but with respect to pretty much everything.
I guess so.
Heh.
It wasn't on purpose. Actually if I had a choice, I probably would have just said, fuck it. Sugar shock my brain, please.
Suffice to say, I have trouble escaping from myself. It's kind of a problem. Let's not talk about it though. Please continue.
Yeah but to be fair, by the time you came looking for me, all three of you were saying that to anything that moved.
Somehow I don't think he's up to the task.
Which is doubly unfortunate, since that's literally what we all came here to do.
Speaking personally, I'd probably run this sword through my own dick before I could bring myself to kill Roxy. Even for her own good.
So.
When the chips are down, I guess that's how much of a badass I really am.
Yeah, our moxie's off the fuckin' charts.
So.
Best birthday ever?
Or best FUCKING birthday ever.
Whatever role I played in ruining your party.
Sorry about that.
Yeah.
I still think I've been pretty lousy to you. I had my head up my ass for a while there.
By the time your birthday came around, I was kinda freaking out about Jake.
I thought I had the situation under control. But I didn't. Not just with Jake, but with respect to pretty much everything.
I guess so.
Heh.
It wasn't on purpose. Actually if I had a choice, I probably would have just said, fuck it. Sugar shock my brain, please.
Suffice to say, I have trouble escaping from myself. It's kind of a problem. Let's not talk about it though. Please continue.
Yeah but to be fair, by the time you came looking for me, all three of you were saying that to anything that moved.
Somehow I don't think he's up to the task.
Which is doubly unfortunate, since that's literally what we all came here to do.
Speaking personally, I'd probably run this sword through my own dick before I could bring myself to kill Roxy. Even for her own good.
So.
When the chips are down, I guess that's how much of a badass I really am.
Yeah, our moxie's off the fuckin' charts.
Jane, you know,
We probably should have talked about this Jake stuff a long time ago.
I don't know if I was kidding myself all those years that there was a conflict of interest between us, or what.
Maybe I was just pretending your feelings for him weren't a factor because my pursuit of him was already overcomplicated enough.
Or maybe it was more like I was aware of them, but on some level decided they shouldn't matter, because I felt like you had a natural advantage over me.
Cause you know. You're like.
Not a dude.
Yeah well. Turns out maybe that's not such a good quality if you wanna make a relationship last longer than three seconds. At least not in my case.
I know I ripped into him pretty hard when I had the clown hair and the little soda can on my head.
But the truth is I was pretty goddamn overbearing.
Sometimes I look back on stuff and think I might have essentially bullied him into a relationship with me.
Actually, it's more complicated than that. Parts of me were operating independently from myself.
So it's like I was bullying myself into bullying him into liking me. If that makes sense.
Anyway, my insanity scared him right the fuck off. There were times when I basically treated him like shit without even realizing it, and I regret it.
I should probably tell him that, but given how I just called him an asshole while wearing orange suspenders, I'm probably the last person he wants to hear from now.
Can we both at least agree we may have overrated the allure of Jake English?
Maybe if we could have talked to each other about him it would have helped. Like talked about why we felt that way about him.
At least maybe it would have helped us knock English down from the ludicrous pedestal we put him on.
So does that mean we're both totally over him now? I can't really tell.
I guess the real problem is our clique was too small.
Poor Jake was the only viable romantic target. I mean, considering our respective orientations.
Maybe we just never knew enough people?
In the interest of appeasing the bitterness gods, let's go with the latter.
Jane, you know,
We probably should have talked about this Jake stuff a long time ago.
I don't know if I was kidding myself all those years that there was a conflict of interest between us, or what.
Maybe I was just pretending your feelings for him weren't a factor because my pursuit of him was already overcomplicated enough.
Or maybe it was more like I was aware of them, but on some level decided they shouldn't matter, because I felt like you had a natural advantage over me.
Cause you know. You're like.
Not a dude.
Yeah well. Turns out maybe that's not such a good quality if you wanna make a relationship last longer than three seconds. At least not in my case.
I know I ripped into him pretty hard when I had the clown hair and the little soda can on my head.
But the truth is I was pretty goddamn overbearing.
Sometimes I look back on stuff and think I might have essentially bullied him into a relationship with me.
Actually, it's more complicated than that. Parts of me were operating independently from myself.
So it's like I was bullying myself into bullying him into liking me. If that makes sense.
Anyway, my insanity scared him right the fuck off. There were times when I basically treated him like shit without even realizing it, and I regret it.
I should probably tell him that, but given how I just called him an asshole while wearing orange suspenders, I'm probably the last person he wants to hear from now.
Can we both at least agree we may have overrated the allure of Jake English?
Maybe if we could have talked to each other about him it would have helped. Like talked about why we felt that way about him.
At least maybe it would have helped us knock English down from the ludicrous pedestal we put him on.
So does that mean we're both totally over him now? I can't really tell.
I guess the real problem is our clique was too small.
Poor Jake was the only viable romantic target. I mean, considering our respective orientations.
Maybe we just never knew enough people?
In the interest of appeasing the bitterness gods, let's go with the latter.
Is it still going on?
What do you think it was?
I'm not sure if these moons can have earthquakes.
Is it still going on?
What do you think it was?
I'm not sure if these moons can have earthquakes.
Have you and Roxy been talking?
Is she pissed at me or something?
She won't talk to me.
Then what gives.
Have you and Roxy been talking?
Is she pissed at me or something?
She won't talk to me.
Then what gives.
Well, yeah. I was upset she fell off the horse.
Or the wagon. The horse wagon. Whatever.
The thing you ride around on when you ain't drinking.
But so what. There was cotton candy in her hair, and she was being stupid. What do you expect? It was a moment of indiscretion.
I'm not mad at her and I'm not disappointed in her. That's ridiculous.
Want to know what I really think of Roxy?
Well, yeah. I was upset she fell off the horse.
Or the wagon. The horse wagon. Whatever.
The thing you ride around on when you ain't drinking.
But so what. There was cotton candy in her hair, and she was being stupid. What do you expect? It was a moment of indiscretion.
I'm not mad at her and I'm not disappointed in her. That's ridiculous.
Want to know what I really think of Roxy?
Remember way back before this started, we were talking. You and me.
And I was rambling at length about leadership, like I actually had a clue what I was talking about?
Yeah. That's kind of the point.
I guess in a way, I was right. But not how I expected.
Remember way back before this started, we were talking. You and me.
And I was rambling at length about leadership, like I actually had a clue what I was talking about?
Yeah. That's kind of the point.
I guess in a way, I was right. But not how I expected.
We were all designated for a session that was utterly inert.
A place where the mechanisms for success never even existed to begin with.
In such a place it makes sense that the formal leader would be neutralized, to made feel unempowered and static.
And it seems particularly fitting she would be the noble of life in a realm of the dead.
A realm that foretold of a life player who felt lifeless, a hope player who felt hopeless, and a heart player who was just a stone cold motherfucker.
When we talked about leadership, and I was all on my high horse telling you how shit would go down...
I also said I would be the one "pulling the strings." Remember? That I'd be the functional leader of our party.
And there might have been something to that, in a different session.
But what good is a "man of action" in a place where action itself is intrinsically fruitless?
So it's occurred to me that by some tragic flaw in its design, our session was meant to be leaderless.
And I'd feel safe concluding that. Except for a feeling that's been gnawing at me.
We were all designated for a session that was utterly inert.
A place where the mechanisms for success never even existed to begin with.
In such a place it makes sense that the formal leader would be neutralized, to made feel unempowered and static.
And it seems particularly fitting she would be the noble of life in a realm of the dead.
A realm that foretold of a life player who felt lifeless, a hope player who felt hopeless, and a heart player who was just a stone cold motherfucker.
When we talked about leadership, and I was all on my high horse telling you how shit would go down...
I also said I would be the one "pulling the strings." Remember? That I'd be the functional leader of our party.
And there might have been something to that, in a different session.
But what good is a "man of action" in a place where action itself is intrinsically fruitless?
So it's occurred to me that by some tragic flaw in its design, our session was meant to be leaderless.
And I'd feel safe concluding that. Except for a feeling that's been gnawing at me.
So that's how crazy it is for her to think I'm disappointed in her.
The truth is, she's the most amazing person I ever knew.
She's everything in a human being I wish I could be, but can't because I'm in my own way.
Honestly, I'm not even sure if I'm worthy of dying next to her.
I think she probably felt bad for hitting on me all those years. Like I was getting fed up with her, or something.
But all it really did was make me feel guilty.
That I couldn't give her what she wanted.
So that's how crazy it is for her to think I'm disappointed in her.
The truth is, she's the most amazing person I ever knew.
She's everything in a human being I wish I could be, but can't because I'm in my own way.
Honestly, I'm not even sure if I'm worthy of dying next to her.
I think she probably felt bad for hitting on me all those years. Like I was getting fed up with her, or something.
But all it really did was make me feel guilty.
That I couldn't give her what she wanted.
I know.
I'm a little reluctant to drop all that on her.
Looking at what I just said, it's...
Kind of overwhelming?
I feel like in a way you can destroy somebody with effusive praise.
Or maybe I'm just projecting how I would feel about that kind of intense positivity coming at me. I dunno.
But I still think confessions like that can change stuff between people. Like the way they act around each other.
I know.
I'm a little reluctant to drop all that on her.
Looking at what I just said, it's...
Kind of overwhelming?
I feel like in a way you can destroy somebody with effusive praise.
Or maybe I'm just projecting how I would feel about that kind of intense positivity coming at me. I dunno.
But I still think confessions like that can change stuff between people. Like the way they act around each other.
No, wait.
Don't.
That would be a weird mixed signal. I mean...
It's true.
But please say something else instead.
No, wait.
Don't.
That would be a weird mixed signal. I mean...
It's true.
But please say something else instead.
So.
Have you made any progress in determining what our malefactors want from you and Karkat?
Well?
And?
...
Are you still there?
Speak to her about what?
I see.
At least it would seem you have a project.
Terezi and I have received no such instruction.
Hello?
Kanaya, do you want to talk about my problem?
The one pertaining to my substance abuse.
Are you busy?
You seem preoccupied.
What are you doing?
You're buying things?
What things?
Like what?
And from whom?
Are you in a consort village?
Don't those shops only sell jars of bugs and such?
You're not buying jars of bugs, are you?
Kanaya, I'm confused.
Could you be a little more descriptive?
Your problem?
Don't you mean my problem?
